If you hitherto believed in the highest value of life and now find
yourselves disillusioned, must you immediately get rid of life at the
lowest possible price?
%
One can even become overnice as regards the clearness of concepts. How
disgusted one is then at having truck with the half-clear, the hazy,
the aspiring, the doubting! How ridiculous and yet not mirth-provoking
is their eternal fluttering and straining without ever being able to
fly or to grasp!
%
He who realises at last how long and how thoroughly he has been befooled,
embraces out of spite even the ugliest reality. So that in the long run
of the world’s history the best men have always been wooers of reality,
for the best have always been longest and most thoroughly deceived.
%
The difference between past and present freethinking cannot better be
characterised than by that aphorism for the recognition and expression
of which all the fearlessness of the eighteenth century was needed,
and which even then, if measured by our modern view, sinks into an
unconscious naïveté. I mean Voltaire’s aphorism, “croyez-moi,
mon ami, l’erreur aussi a son mérite.”
%
Philosophers have at all times appropriated and _corrupted_ the maxims
of censors of men (moralists), by taking them over without qualification
and trying to prove as necessary what the moralists only meant as a
rough indication or as a truth suited to their fellow-countrymen or
fellow-townsmen for a single decade.  Moreover, the philosophers thought
that they were thereby raising themselves above the moralists! Thus
it will be found that the celebrated teachings of Schopenhauer as to
the supremacy of the will over the intellect, of the immutability of
character, the negativity of pleasure—all errors, in the sense in which
he understands them—rest upon principles of popular wisdom enunciated by
the moralists. Take the very word “will,” which Schopenhauer twisted
so as to become a common denotation of several human conditions and with
which he filled a gap in the language (to his own great advantage, in
so far as he was a moralist, for he became free to speak of the will as
Pascal had spoken of it). In the hands of its creator, Schopenhauer’s
“will,” through the philosophic craze for generalisation, already
turned out to be a bane to knowledge.  For this will was made into a
poetic metaphor, when it was held that all things in nature possess
will. Finally, that it might be applied to all kinds of disordered
mysticism, the word was misused by a fraudulent convention. So now all
our fashionable philosophers repeat it and seem to be perfectly certain
that all things have a will and are in fact One Will.  According to the
description generally given of this All-One-Will, this is much as if
one should positively try to have the stupid Devil for one’s God.
%
The visionary denies the truth to himself, the liar only to others.
%
If we make it clear to any one that, strictly, he can never speak
of truth, but only of probability and of its degrees, we generally
discover, from the undisguised joy of our pupil, how greatly men prefer
the uncertainty of their intellectual horizon, and how in their heart of
hearts they hate truth because of its definiteness.—Is this due to a
secret fear felt by all that the light of truth may at some time be turned
too brightly upon themselves? To their wish to be of some consequence,
and accordingly their concealment from the world of what they are? Or is
it to be traced to their horror of the all-too brilliant light, to which
their crepuscular, easily dazzled, bat-like souls are not accustomed,
so that hate it they must?
%
Pilate, with his question, “What is Truth?” is now gleefully brought
on the scene as an advocate of Christ, in order to cast suspicion on
all that is known or knowable as being mere appearance, and to erect
the Cross on the appalling background of the Impossibility of Knowledge.
%
“NATURAL LAW,” A PHRASE OF SUPERSTITION.—When you talk so
delightedly of Nature acting according to law, you must either assume that
all things in Nature follow their law from a voluntary obedience imposed
by themselves—in which case you admire the morality of Nature: or you
are enchanted with the idea of a creative mechanician, who has made a
most cunning watch with human beings as accessory ornaments.—Necessity,
through the expression, “conformity to law,” then becomes more human
and a coign of refuge in the last instance for mythological reveries.
%
All misty philosophers and obscurers of the world, in other words all
metaphysicians of coarse or refined texture are seized with eyeache,
earache, and toothache when they begin to suspect that there is truth in
the saying: “All philosophy has from now fallen forfeit to history.”
In view of their aches and pains we may pardon them for throwing stones
and filth at him who talks like this, but this teaching may itself
thereby become dirty and disreputable for a time and lose in effect.
%
He whose intellect is really free will think freely about the intellect
itself, and will not shut his eyes to certain terrible aspects of its
source and tendency. For this reason others will perhaps designate
him the bitterest opponent of free thought and give him that dreadful,
abusive name of “pessimist of the intellect”: accustomed as they
are to typify a man not by his strong point, his pre-eminent virtue,
but by the quality that is most foreign to his nature.
%
To all who talk so boastfully of the scientific basis of their metaphysics
it is best to make no reply. It is enough to tug at the bundle that
they rather shyly keep hidden behind their backs. If one succeeds in
lifting it, the results of that “scientific basis” come to light, to
their great confusion: a dear little “God,” a genteel immortality,
perhaps a little spiritualism, and in any case a complicated mass of
poor-sinners’-misery and pharisee-arrogance.
%
The utility involved in the unchecked investigation of knowledge is so
constantly proved in a hundred different ways that one must remember to
include in the bargain the subtler and rarer damage which individuals
must suffer on that account. The chemist cannot avoid occasionally being
poisoned or burnt at his experiments. What applies to the chemist, is
true of the whole of our culture. This, it may be added, clearly shows
that knowledge should provide itself with healing balsam against burns
and should always have antidotes ready against poisons.
%
The Philistine thinks that his most urgent need is a purple patch or
turban of metaphysics, nor will he let it slip.  Yet he would look less
ridiculous without this adornment.
%
With all that enthusiasts say in favour of their gospel or their master
they are defending themselves, however much they comport themselves as
the judges and not the accused: because they are involuntarily reminded
almost at every moment that they are exceptions and have to assert
their legitimacy.
%
All good things, even all good books that are written against life,
are strong means of attraction to life.
%
“When we hear the hair-splitting metaphysicians and prophets of the
after-world speak, we others feel indeed that we are the ‘poor in
spirit,’ but that ours is the heavenly kingdom of change, with spring
and autumn, summer and winter, and theirs the after-world, with its
grey, everlasting frosts and shadows.” Thus soliloquised a man as he
walked in the morning sunshine, a man who in his pursuit of history has
constantly changed not only his mind but his heart.  In contrast to the
metaphysicians, he is happy to harbour in himself not an “immortal
soul” but many _mortal_ souls.
%
There are streaming, flowing, trickling mineral springs, and three
corresponding varieties of thinkers. The layman values them by the volume
of the water, the expert by the contents of the water—in other words,
by the elements in them that are not water.
%
The task of painting the picture of life, often as it has been attempted
by poets and philosophers, is nevertheless irrational.  Even in the
hands of the greatest artist-thinkers, pictures and miniatures of one
life only—their own—have come into being, and indeed no other result
is possible. While in the process of developing, a thing that develops,
cannot mirror itself as fixed and permanent, as a _definite object_.
%
The belief in truth begins with the doubt of all truths in which one
has previously believed.
%
If we speak of freethinking as of a highly dangerous journey over glaciers
and frozen seas, we find that those who do not care to travel on this
track are offended, as if they had been reproached with cowardice and
weak knees. The difficult, which we find to be beyond our powers, must
not even be mentioned in our presence.
%
_Historia in Nuce._—The most serious parody I ever heard was this:
“In the beginning was the nonsense, and the nonsense was with God,
and the nonsense was God.”(4)
%
The idealist is incorrigible: if he be thrown out of his Heaven, he makes
himself a suitable ideal out of Hell. Disillusion him, and lo! he will
embrace disillusionment with no less ardour than he recently embraced
hope. In so far as his impulse belongs to the great incurable impulses
of human nature, he can bring about tragic destinies and later become
a subject for tragedy himself, for such tragedies as deal with the
incurable, implacable, inevitable in the lot and character of man.
%
Sparkling eyes and an amiable smile are the tributes of applause paid
to all the great comedy of world and existence—but this applause
is a comedy within a comedy, meant to tempt the other spectators to a
_plaudite amici_.
%
He who has not the courage to allow himself and his work to be considered
tedious, is certainly no intellect of the first rank, whether in the
arts or in the sciences.—A scoffer, who happened for once in a way
to be a thinker, might add, with a glance at the world and at history:
“God did not possess this courage, for he wanted to make and he made
all things so interesting.”
%
Nothing is harder for a man than to conceive of an object impersonally, I
mean to see in it an object and not a person. One may even ask whether it
is possible for him to dispense for a single moment with the machinery
of his instinct to create and construct a personality. After all,
he associates with his thoughts, however abstract they may be, as with
individuals, against whom he must fight or to whom he must attach himself,
whom he must protect, support and nourish. Let us watch or listen to
ourselves at the moment when we hear or discover a new idea. Perhaps
it displeases us because it is so defiant and so autocratic, and we
unconsciously ask ourselves whether we cannot place a contradiction
of it by its side as an enemy, or fasten on to it a “perhaps”
or a “sometimes”: the mere little word “probably” gives us
a feeling of satisfaction, for it shatters the oppressive tyranny of
the unconditional. If, on the other hand, the new idea enters in gentle
shape, sweetly patient and humble, and falling at once into the arms of
contradiction, we put our autocracy to the test in another way. Can we
not come to the aid of this weak creature, stroke it and feed it, give it
strength and fulness, and truth and even unconditionality? Is it possible
for us to show ourselves parental or chivalrous or compassionate towards
our idea?—Then again, we see here a judgment and there a judgment,
sundered from each other, never looking at or making any movement
towards each other. So we are tickled by the thought, whether it be
not here feasible to make a match, to draw a _conclusion_, with the
anticipation that if a consequence follows this conclusion it is not only
the two judgments united in wedlock but the matchmakers that will gain
honour. If, however, we cannot acquire a hold upon that thought either on
the path of defiance and ill-will or on that of good-will (if we hold it
to be true)—then we submit to it and do homage to it as a leader and a
prince, give it a chair of honour, and speak not of it without a flourish
of trumpets: for we are bright in its brightness.  Woe to him who tries
to dim this brightness! Perhaps we ourselves one day grow suspicious of
our idea. Then we, the indefatigable “king-makers” of the history
of the intellect, cast it down from its throne and immediately exalt
its adversary. Surely if this be considered and thought out a little
further, no one will speak of an “absolute impulse to knowledge”!
Why, then, does man prefer the true to the untrue, in this secret combat
with thought-personalities, in this generally clandestine match-making of
thoughts, constitution-founding of thoughts, child-rearing of thoughts,
nursing and almsgiving of thoughts? For the same reason that he practises
honesty in intercourse with real persons: _now_ from habit, heredity,
and training, _originally_ because the true, like the fair and the just,
is more expedient and more reputable than the untrue. For in the realm
of thought it is difficult to assume a power and glory that are built
on error or on falsehood. The feeling that such an edifice might at some
time collapse is humiliating to the self-esteem of the architect—he is
ashamed of the fragility of the material, and, as he considers himself
more important than the rest of the world, he would fain construct
nothing that is less durable than the rest of the world. In his longing
for truth he embraces the belief in a personal immortality, the most
arrogant and defiant idea that exists, closely allied as it is to the
underlying thought, _pereat mundus, dum ego salvus sim!_ His work has
become his “ego,” he transforms himself into the Imperishable with
its universal challenge. It is his immeasurable pride that will only
employ the best and hardest stones for the work—truths, or what he
holds for such. Arrogance has always been justly called the “vice of
the sage”; yet without this vice, fruitful in impulses, Truth and her
status on earth would be in a parlous plight. In our propensity to fear
our thoughts, concepts and words, and yet to honour ourselves in them,
unconsciously to ascribe to them the power of rewarding, despising,
praising, and blaming us, and so to associate with them as with free
intellectual personalities, as with independent powers, as with our
equals—herein lie the roots of the remarkable phenomenon which I have
called “intellectual conscience.” Thus something of the highest
moral species has bloomed from a black root.
%
The essential feature of the black art of obscurantism is not its
intention of clouding the brain, but its attempt to darken the picture
of the world and cloud our idea of existence. It often employs the
method of thwarting all illumination of the intellect, but at times it
uses the very opposite means, seeking by the highest refinement of the
intellect to induce a satiety of the intellect’s fruits. Hair-splitting
metaphysicians, who pave the way for scepticism and by their excessive
acumen provoke a distrust of acumen, are excellent instruments of the
more subtle form of obscurantism.—Is it possible that even Kant may be
applied to this purpose? Did he even _intend_ something of the sort, for
a time at least, to judge from his own notorious exposition: “to clear
the way for belief by setting limitations to knowledge”?—Certainly
he did not succeed, nor did his followers, on the wolf and fox tracks
of this highly refined and dangerous form of obscurantism—the most
dangerous of all, for the black art here appears in the garb of light.
%
When the mists of a metaphysical-mystical philosophy succeed in making
all æsthetic phenomena _opaque_, it follows that these phenomena
cannot be comparatively valued, inasmuch as each becomes individually
inexplicable. But when once they cannot be compared for the sake
of valuation, there arises an entire absence-of-criticism, a blind
indulgence. From this source springs a continual diminution of the
enjoyment of art (which is only distinguished from the crude satisfaction
of a need by the highest refinement of taste and appreciation). The more
taste diminishes, the more does the desire for art change and revert to
a vulgar hunger, which the artist henceforth seeks to appease by ever
coarser fare.
%
The most painful thing a thinker can say to artists is: “Could ye not
_watch_ with me one hour?”
%
There are many (artists and women, for instance) who work against the
few that take a pleasure in untying the knot of things and unravelling
their woof. The former always want to weave the woof together again and
entangle it and so turn the conceived into the unconceived and if possible
inconceivable. Whatever the result may be, the woof and knot always look
rather untidy, because too many hands are working and tugging at them.
%
As the man of science proceeds on his modest and toilsome wanderings,
which must often enough be journeys in the desert, he is confronted with
those brilliant mirages known as “philosophic systems.” With magic
powers of deception they show him that the solution of all riddles and the
most refreshing draught of true water of life are close at hand. His weary
heart rejoices, and he well-nigh touches with his lips the goal of all
scientific endurance and hardship, so that almost unconsciously he presses
forward. Other natures stand still, as if spellbound by the beautiful
illusion: the desert swallows them up, they become lost to science. Other
natures, again, that have often experienced these subjective consolations,
become very disheartened and curse the salty taste which these mirages
leave behind in the mouth and from which springs a raging thirst—without
one’s having come one step nearer to any sort of a spring.
%
When the poet depicts the various callings—such as those of the
warrior, the silk-weaver, the sailor—he feigns to know all these things
thoroughly, to be an expert. Even in the exposition of human actions and
destinies he behaves as if he had been present at the spinning of the
whole web of existence. In so far he is an impostor. He practises his
frauds on pure ignoramuses, and that is why he succeeds. They praise him
for his deep, genuine knowledge, and lead him finally into the delusion
that he really knows as much as the individual experts and creators, yes,
even as the great world-spinners themselves. In the end, the impostor
becomes honest, and actually believes in his own sincerity. Emotional
people say to his very face that he has the “higher” truth and
sincerity—for they are weary of reality for the time being, and accept
the poetic dream as a pleasant relaxation and a night’s rest for head
and heart. The visions of the dream now appear to them of more value,
because, as has been said, they find them more beneficial, and mankind
has always held that what is apparently of more value is more true,
more real.  All that is generally called reality, the poets, conscious of
this power, proceed with intention to disparage and to distort into the
uncertain, the illusory, the spurious, the impure, the sinful, sorrowful,
and deceitful.  They make use of all doubts about the limits of knowledge,
of all sceptical excesses, in order to spread over everything the rumpled
veil of uncertainty. For they desire that when this darkening process is
complete their wizardry and soul-magic may be accepted without hesitation
as the path to “true truth” and “real reality.”
%
Schopenhauer, whose profound understanding of what is human and
all-too-human and original sense for facts was not a little impaired
by the bright leopard-skin of his metaphysic (the skin must first
be pulled off him if one wants to find the real moralist genius
beneath)—Schopenhauer makes this admirable distinction, wherein he comes
far nearer the mark than he would himself dare to admit: “Insight into
the stern necessity of human actions is the boundary line that divides
philosophic from other brains.” He worked against that wonderful insight
of which he was sometimes capable by the prejudice that he had in common
with the moral man (not the moralist), a prejudice that he expresses quite
guilelessly and devoutly as follows: “The ultimate and true explanation
of the inner being of the entirety of things must of necessity be closely
connected with that about the ethical significance of human actions.”
This connection is not “necessary” at all: such a connection must
rather be rejected by that principle of the stern necessity of human
actions, that is, the unconditioned non-freedom and non-responsibility
of the will. Philosophic brains will accordingly be distinguished
from others by their disbelief in the metaphysical significance of
morality. This must create between the two kinds of brain a gulf of
a depth and unbridgeableness of which the much-deplored gulf between
“cultured” and “uncultured” scarcely gives a conception. It
is true that many back doors, which the “philosophic brains,” like
Schopenhauer’s own, have left for themselves, must be recognised as
useless. None leads into the open, into the fresh air of the free will,
but every door through which people had slipped hitherto showed behind
it once more the gleaming brass wall of fate. For we are in a prison, and
can only dream of freedom, not make ourselves free. That the recognition
of this fact cannot be resisted much longer is shown by the despairing
and incredible postures and grimaces of those who still press against it
and continue their wrestling-bout with it. Their attitude at present is
something like this: “So no one is responsible for his actions? And
all is full of guilt and the consciousness of guilt? But some one
_must_ be the sinner. If it is no longer possible or permissible to
accuse and sentence the individual, the one poor wave in the inevitable
rough-and-tumble of the waves of development—well, then, let this stormy
sea, this development itself, be the sinner. Here is free will: this
totality can be accused and sentenced, can atone and expiate. _So let God
be the sinner and man his redeemer._ Let the world’s history be guilt,
expiation, and self-murder.  Let the evil-doer be his own judge, the
judge his own hangman.” This Christianity strained to its limits—for
what else is it?—is the last thrust in the fencing-match between the
teaching of unconditioned morality and the teaching of unconditioned
non-freedom. It would be quite horrible if it were anything more than
a logical pose, a hideous grimace of the underlying thought, perhaps
the death-convulsion of the heart that seeks a remedy in its despair,
the heart to which delirium whispers: “Behold, thou art the lamb which
taketh away the sin of God.” This error lies not only in the feeling,
“I am responsible,” but just as much in the contradiction, “I
am not responsible, but some one must be.” That is simply not true.
Hence the philosopher must say, like Christ, “Judge not,” and the
final distinction between the philosophic brains and the others would
be that the former wish to be just and the latter wish to be judges.
%
_Sacrifice._—You hold that sacrifice is the hallmark of moral
action?—Just consider whether in every action that is done with
deliberation, in the best as in the worst, there be not a sacrifice.
%
One must know the best and the worst that a man is capable of in theory
and in practice before one can judge how strong his moral nature is and
can be. But this is an experiment that one can never carry out.
%
Whether we have a serpent’s tooth or not we cannot know before some
one has set his heel upon our necks. A wife or a mother could say: until
some one has put his heel upon the neck of our darling, our child.—Our
character is determined more by the absence of certain experiences than
by the experiences we have undergone.
%
We forget and purposely banish from our minds a good deal of our past. In
other words, we wish our picture, that beams at us from the past, to
belie us, to flatter our vanity—we are constantly engaged in this
self-deception. And you who talk and boast so much of “self-oblivion
in love,” of the “absorption of the ego in the other person”—you
hold that this is something different? So you break the mirror, throw
yourselves into another personality that you admire, and enjoy the new
portrait of your ego, though calling it by the other person’s name—and
this whole proceeding is not to be thought self-deception, self-seeking,
you marvellous beings?—It seems to me that those who hide something of
themselves from themselves, or hide their whole selves from themselves,
are alike committing a theft from the treasury of knowledge. It is
clear, then, against what transgression the maxim “Know thyself” is
a warning.
%
He who denies his own vanity usually possesses it in so brutal a form
that he instinctively shuts his eyes to avoid the necessity of despising
himself.
%
To those arguments of our adversary against which our head feels too weak
our heart replies by throwing suspicion on the motives of his arguments.
%
An art that points out and glorifies the exceptional cases of
morality—where the good becomes bad and the unjust just—should rarely
be given a hearing: just as now and again we buy something from gipsies,
with the fear that they are diverting to their own pockets much more
than their mere profit from the purchase.
%
The only decisive argument that has always deterred men from drinking
a poison is not that it is deadly, but that it has an unpleasant taste.
%
If men only committed such deeds as do not give rise to a bad conscience,
the human world would still look bad and rascally enough, but not so
sickly and pitiable as at present.—Enough wicked men without conscience
have existed at all times, and many good honest folk lack the feeling
of pleasure in a good conscience.
%
It is more convenient to follow one’s conscience than one’s
intelligence, for at every failure conscience finds an excuse and an
encouragement in itself. That is why there are so many conscientious
and so few intelligent people.
%
One temperament finds it useful to be able to give vent to its disgust in
words, being made sweeter by speech. Another reaches its full bitterness
only by speaking out: it is more advisable for it to have to gulp down
something—the restraint that men of this stamp place upon themselves
in the presence of enemies and superiors improves their character and
prevents it from becoming too acrid and sour.
%
To get bed-sores is unpleasant, but no proof against the merits of the
cure that prescribes that you should take to your bed. Men who have long
lived outside themselves, and have at last devoted themselves to the
inward philosophic life, know that one can also get sores of character and
intellect. This, again, is on the whole no argument against the chosen way
of life, but necessitates a few small exceptions and apparent relapses.
%
The most vulnerable and yet most unconquerable of things is human vanity:
nay, through being wounded its strength increases and can grow to giant
proportions.
%
By an excess of effort they win leisure for themselves, and then they
can do nothing with it but count the hours until the tale is ended.
%
He that has joy abounding must be a good man, but perhaps he is not the
cleverest of men, although he has reached the very goal towards which
the cleverest man is striving with all his cleverness.
%
Is not a man fairly well described, when we are told that he likes to
walk between tall fields of golden corn: that he prefers the forest and
flower colours of sere and chilly autumn to all others, because they
point to something more beautiful than Nature has ever attained: that
he feels as much at home under big broad-leaved walnut trees as among
his nearest kinsfolk: that in the mountains his greatest joy is to come
across those tiny distant lakes from which the very eyes of solitude seem
to peer at him: that he loves that grey calm of the misty twilight that
steals along the windows on autumn and early winter evenings and shuts
out all soulless sounds as with velvet curtains: that in unhewn stones
he recognises the last remaining traces of the primeval age, eager for
speech, and honours them from childhood upwards: that, lastly, the sea
with its shifting serpent skin and wild-beast beauty is, and remains to
him, unfamiliar?—Yes, something of the man is described herewith, but
the mirror of Nature does not say that the same man, with (and not even
“in spite of”) all his idyllic sensibilities, might be disagreeable,
stingy, and conceited. Horace, who was a good judge of such matters, in
his famous _beatus ille qui procul negotiis_ puts the tenderest feeling
for country life into the mouth of a Roman money-lender.
%
The strongest cognition (that of the complete non-freedom of the human
will) is yet the poorest in results, for it has always had the mightiest
of opponents—human vanity.
%
A beneficial influence on friends is exerted by one man unconsciously,
through his nature; by another consciously, through isolated
actions. Although the former nature is held to be the higher, the
latter alone is allied to good conscience and pleasure—the pleasure in
justification by good works, which rests upon a belief in the volitional
character of our good and evil doing—that is to say, upon a mistake.
%
The injustice we have inflicted ourselves is far harder to bear than the
injustice inflicted upon us by others (not always from moral grounds, be
it observed). After all, the doer is always the sufferer—that is, if he
be capable of feeling the sting of conscience or of perceiving that by his
action he has armed society against himself and cut himself off. For this
reason we should beware still more of doing than of suffering injustice,
for the sake of our own inward happiness—so as not to lose our feeling
of well-being—quite apart from any consideration of the precepts of
religion and morality. For in suffering injustice we have the consolation
of a good conscience, of hope and of revenge, together with the sympathy
and applause of the just, nay of the whole of society, which is afraid
of the evil-doer. Not a few are skilled in the impure self-deception that
enables them to transform every injustice of their own into an injustice
inflicted upon them from without, and to reserve for their own acts the
exceptional right to the plea of self-defence. Their object, of course,
is to make their own burden lighter.
%
Ordinary envy is wont to cackle when the envied hen has laid an egg,
thereby relieving itself and becoming milder. But there is a yet deeper
envy that in such a case becomes dead silent, desiring that every mouth
should be sealed and always more and more angry because this desire is
not gratified. Silent envy grows in silence.
%
Anger exhausts the soul and brings its very dregs to light. Hence, if
we know no other means of gaining certainty, we must understand how to
arouse anger in our dependents and adversaries, in order to learn what
is really done and thought to our detriment.
%
The true heroic deed and masterpiece of the good man does not lie in
attacking opinions and continuing to love their propounders, but in the
far harder task of defending his own position without causing or intending
to cause bitter heartburns to his opponent. The sword of attack is honest
and broad, the sword of defence usually runs out to a needle point.
%
One who is openly honest towards himself ends by being rather conceited
about this honesty. He knows only too well why he is honest—for the
same reason that another man prefers outward show and hypocrisy.
%
The heaping of coals of fire on another’s head is generally
misunderstood and falls flat, because the other knows himself to be just
as much in the right, and on his side too has thought of collecting coals.
%
A man says: “Judging from my own case, I find that this book is
harmful.” Let him but wait, and perhaps one day he will confess that
the book did him a great service by thrusting forward and bringing to
light the hidden disease of his soul.—Altered opinions alter not at all
(or very little) the character of a man: but they illuminate individual
facets of his personality, which hitherto, in another constellation of
opinions, had remained dark and unrecognisable.
%
We simulate pity when we wish to show ourselves superior to the feeling
of animosity, but generally in vain. This point is not noticed without
a considerable enhancement of that feeling of animosity.
%
At the moment when a man openly makes known his difference of opinion
from a well-known party leader, the whole world thinks that he must be
angry with the latter. Sometimes, however, he is just on the point of
ceasing to be angry with him. He ventures to put himself on the same
plane as his opponent, and is free from the tortures of suppressed envy.
%
In the darkest hour of depression, sickness, and guilt, we are still glad
to see others taking a light from us and making use of us as of the disk
of the moon. By this roundabout route we derive some light from our own
illuminating faculty.
%
The snake that stings us means to hurt us and rejoices in so doing:
the lowest animal can picture to itself the _pain_ of others. But to
picture to oneself the _joy_ of others and to rejoice thereat is the
highest privilege of the highest animals, and again, amongst them, is the
property only of the most select specimens—accordingly a rare “human
thing.” Hence there have been philosophers who denied fellowship in joy.
%
_Supplementary Pregnancy._—Those who have arrived at works and deeds
are in an obscure way, they know not how, all the more pregnant with
them, as if to prove supplementarily that these are their children and
not those of chance.
%
Just as justice is so often a cloak for weakness, so men who are fairly
intelligent, but weak, sometimes attempt dissimulation from ambitious
motives and purposely show themselves unjust and hard, in order to leave
behind them the impression of strength.
%
If in a large sack of profit we find a single grain of humiliation we
still make a wry face even at our good luck.
%
There might be Herostratuses who set fire to their own temple, in which
their images are honoured.
%
The fact that all that is weak and in need of help appeals to the heart
induces in us the habit of designating by diminutive and softening terms
all that appeals to our hearts—and accordingly _making_ such things
weak and clinging to our imaginations.
%
Sympathy has a peculiar impudence for its companion. For, wishing to
help at all costs, sympathy is in no perplexity either as to the means
of assistance or as to the nature and cause of the disease, and goes on
courageously administering all its quack medicines to restore the health
and reputation of the patient.
%
There is even an importunacy in relation to works, and the act of
associating oneself from early youth on an intimate footing with
the illustrious works of all times evinces an entire absence of
shame.—Others are only importunate from ignorance, not knowing with
whom they have to do—for instance classical scholars young and old in
relation to the works of the Greeks.
%
In all coolness we make reasonable plans against our passions. But we
make the most serious mistake in this connection in being often ashamed,
when the design has to be carried out, of the coolness and calculation
with which we conceived it. So we do just the unreasonable thing, from
that sort of defiant magnanimity that every passion involves.
%
He who takes his morality solemnly and seriously is enraged against the
sceptics in the domain of morals. For where he lavishes all his force,
he wishes others to marvel but not to investigate and doubt. Then
there are natures whose last shred of morality is just the belief in
morals. They behave in the same way towards sceptics, if possible still
more passionately.
%
All moralists are shy, because they know they are confounded with spies
and traitors, so soon as their penchant is noticed. Besides, they are
generally conscious of being impotent in action, for in the midst of
work the motives of their activity almost withdraw their attention from
the work.
%
People who are at the same time noble and honest come to deify every
devilry that brings out their honesty, and to suspend for a time the
balance of their moral judgment.
%
It is an unpardonable offence when one discovers that where one was
convinced of being loved, one is only regarded as a household utensil
and decoration, whereby the master of the house can find an outlet for
his vanity before his guests.
%
What else is love but understanding and rejoicing that another lives,
works, and feels in a different and opposite way to ourselves? That love
may be able to bridge over the contrasts by joys, we must not remove
or deny those contrasts. Even self-love presupposes an irreconcileable
duality (or plurality) in one person.
%
What one sometimes does not know and feel accurately in waking
hours—whether one has a good or a bad conscience as regards some
person—is revealed completely and unambiguously by dreams.
%
Not joy but joylessness is the mother of debauchery.
%
No one accuses without an underlying notion of punishment and revenge,
even when he accuses his fate or himself. All complaint is accusation,
all self-congratulation is praise. Whether we do one or the other,
we always make some one responsible.
%
We sometimes advance truth by a twofold injustice: when we see and
represent consecutively the two sides of a case which we are not in a
position to see together, but in such a way that every time we mistake
or deny the other side, fancying that what we see is the whole truth.
%
Self-mistrust does not always proceed uncertainly and shyly, but sometimes
in a furious rage, having worked itself into a frenzy in order not
to tremble.
%
If you want to be a personality you must even hold your shadow in honour.
%
We must know how to emerge cleaner from unclean conditions, and, if
necessary, how to wash ourselves even with dirty water.
%
The more you let yourself go, the less others let you go.
%
There is a slow, gradual path to vice and rascality of every
description. In the end, the traveller is quite abandoned by the
insect-swarms of a bad conscience, and although a thorough scoundrel he
walks in innocence.
%
Making plans and conceiving projects involves many agreeable
sentiments. He that had the strength to be nothing but a contriver of
plans all his life would be a happy man. But one must occasionally have
a rest from this activity by carrying a plan into execution, and then
comes anger and sobriety.
%
Every efficient man is blocked by his efficiency and cannot look out
freely from its prison. Had he not also a goodly share of imperfection,
he could, by reason of his virtue, never arrive at an intellectual or
moral freedom. Our shortcomings are the eyes with which we see the ideal.
%
Dishonest praise causes many more twinges of conscience than dishonest
blame, probably only because we have exposed our capacity for judgment
far more completely through excessive praise than through excessive and
unjust blame.
%
The whole way in which a man thinks of death during the prime of his
life and strength is very expressive and significant for what we call his
character. But the hour of death itself, his behaviour on the death-bed,
is almost indifferent. The exhaustion of waning life, especially when old
people die, the irregular or insufficient nourishment of the brain during
this last period, the occasionally violent pain, the novel and untried
nature of the whole position, and only too often the ebb and flow of
superstitious impressions and fears, as if dying were of much consequence
and meant the crossing of bridges of the most terrible kind—all this
forbids our using death as a testimony concerning the living. Nor is it
true that the dying man is generally more honest than the living. On the
contrary, through the solemn attitude of the bystanders, the repressed
or flowing streams of tears and emotions, every one is inveigled into
a comedy of vanity, now conscious, now unconscious.  The serious way in
which every dying man is treated must have been to many a poor despised
devil the highest joy of his whole life and a sort of compensation and
repayment for many privations.
%
The origin of morality may be traced to two ideas: “The community is of
more value than the individual,” and “The permanent interest is to be
preferred to the temporary.” The conclusion drawn is that the permanent
interest of the community is unconditionally to be set above the temporary
interest of the individual, especially his momentary well-being, but also
his permanent interest and even the prolongation of his existence. Even
if the individual suffers by an arrangement that suits the mass, even
if he is depressed and ruined by it, morality must be maintained and the
victim brought to the sacrifice. Such a trend of thought arises, however,
only in those who are _not_ the victims—for in the victim’s case
it enforces the claim that the individual might be worth more than the
many, and that the present enjoyment, the “moment in paradise,”(7)
should perhaps be rated higher than a tame succession of untroubled
or comfortable circumstances. But the philosophy of the sacrificial
victim always finds voice too late, and so victory remains with morals
and morality: which are really nothing more than the sentiment for the
whole concept of morals under which one lives and has been reared—and
reared not as an individual but as a member of the whole, as a cipher
in a majority. Hence it constantly happens that the individual makes
himself into a majority by means of his morality.
%
You hold that all good things have at all times had a good
conscience? Science, which is certainly a very good thing, has come into
the world without such a conscience and quite free from all pathos,
rather clandestinely, by roundabout ways, walking with shrouded or
masked face like a sinner, and always with the feeling at least of being
a smuggler. Good conscience has bad conscience for its stepping-stone,
not for its opposite. For all that is good has at one time been new and
consequently strange, against morals, immoral, and has gnawed like a
worm at the heart of the fortunate discoverer.
%
We should not shrink from treading the road to a virtue, even when we
see clearly that nothing but egotism, and accordingly utility, personal
comfort, fear, considerations of health, reputation, or glory, are the
impelling motives. These motives are styled ignoble and selfish. Very
well, but if they stimulate us to some virtue—for example, self-denial,
dutifulness, order, thrift, measure, and moderation—let us listen to
them, whatever their epithets may be! For if we reach the goal to which
they summon us, then the virtue we have attained, by means of the pure
air it makes us breathe and the spiritual well-being it communicates,
ennobles the remoter impulses of our action, and afterwards we no longer
perform those actions from the same coarse motives that inspired us
before.—Education should therefore force the virtues on the pupil,
as far as possible, according to his disposition.  Then virtue, the
sunshine and summer atmosphere of the soul, can contribute her own share
of work and add mellowness and sweetness.
%
So that is your Christianity!—To annoy humanity you praise “God
and His Saints,” and again when you want to praise humanity you go
so far that God and His Saints must be annoyed.—I wish you would at
least learn Christian manners, as you are so deficient in the civility
of the Christian heart.
%
A true believer must be to us an object of veneration, but the same holds
good of a true, sincere, convinced unbeliever. With men of the latter
stamp we are near to the high mountains where mighty rivers have their
source, and with believers we are under vigorous, shady, restful trees.
%
The two greatest judicial murders(8) in the world’s history are, to
speak without exaggeration, concealed and well-concealed suicide. In
both cases a man _willed_ to die, and in both cases he let his breast
be pierced by the sword in the hand of human injustice.
%
“LOVE.”—The finest artistic conception wherein Christianity had the
advantage over other religious systems lay in one word—Love. Hence it
became the _lyric_ religion (whereas in its two other creations Semitism
bestowed heroico-epical religions upon the world). In the word “love”
there is so much meaning, so much that stimulates and appeals to memory
and hope, that even the meanest intelligence and the coldest heart feel
some glimmering of its sense. The cleverest woman and the lowest man
think of the comparatively unselfish moments of their whole life, even
if with them Eros never soared high: and the vast number of beings who
_miss_ love from their parents or children or sweethearts, especially
those whose sexual instincts have been refined away, have found their
heart’s desire in Christianity.
%
In Christianity there is also an Epicurean trend of thought, starting from
the idea that God can only demand of man, his creation and his image, what
it is possible for man to fulfil, and accordingly that Christian virtue
and perfection are attainable and often attained. Now, for instance, the
belief in loving one’s enemies—even if it is only a belief or fancy,
and by no means a psychological reality (a real love)—gives unalloyed
happiness, so long as it is genuinely believed. (As to the reason of
this, psychologist and Christian might well differ.)  Hence earthly
life, through the belief, I mean the fancy, that it satisfies not only
the injunction to love our enemies, but all the other injunctions of
Christianity, and that it has really assimilated and embodied in itself
the Divine perfection according to the command, “Be perfect as your
Father in heaven is perfect,” might actually become a holy life. Thus
error can make Christ’s promise come true.
%
We may be allowed to form a conjecture as to the disappearance
of Christianity and as to the places where it will be the slowest to
retreat, if we consider where and for what reasons Protestantism spread
with such startling rapidity. As is well known, Protestantism promised to
do far more cheaply all that the old Church did, without costly masses,
pilgrimages, and priestly pomp and circumstance. It spread particularly
among the Northern nations, which were not so deeply rooted as those
of the South in the old Church’s symbolism and love of ritual. In
the South the more powerful pagan religion survived in Christianity,
whereas in the North Christianity meant an opposition to and a break
with the old-time creed, and hence was from the first more thoughtful
and less sensual, but for that very reason, in times of peril, more
fanatical and more obstinate. If from the standpoint of _thought_
we succeed in uprooting Christianity, we can at once know the point
where it will begin to disappear—the very point at which it will be
most stubborn in defence. In other places it will bend but not break,
lose its leaves but burst into leaf afresh, because the senses, and not
thought, have gone over to its side. But it is the senses that maintain
the belief that with all its expensive outlay the Church is more cheaply
and conveniently managed than under the stern conditions of work and
wages. Yet what does one hold leisure (or semi-idleness) to be worth,
when once one has become accustomed to it? The senses plead against
a dechristianised world, saying that there would be too much work to
do in it and an insufficient supply of leisure. They take the part of
magic—that is, they let God work himself (_oremus nos, Deus laboret_).
%
There is no book that contains in such abundance or expresses so
faithfully all that man occasionally finds salutary—ecstatic inward
happiness, ready for sacrifice or death in the belief in and contemplation
of _his_ truth—as the book that tells of Christ. From that book a clever
man may learn all the means whereby a book can be made into a world-book,
a vade-mecum for all, and especially that master-means of representing
everything as discovered, nothing as future and uncertain. All influential
books try to leave the same impression, as if the widest intellectual
horizon were circumscribed here and as if about the sun that shines
here every constellation visible at present or in the future must
revolve.—Must not then all purely scientific books be poor in influence
on the same grounds as such books are rich in influence? Is not the book
fated to live humble and among humble folk, in order to be crucified in
the end and never resurrected? In relation to what the religious inform
us of their “knowledge” and their “holy spirit,” are not all
upright men of science “poor in spirit”? Can any religion demand
more self-denial and draw the selfish out of themselves more inexorably
than science?—This and similar things we may say, in any case with a
certain theatricality, when we have to defend ourselves against believers,
for it is impossible to conduct a defence without a certain amount of
theatricality. But between ourselves our language must be more honest,
and we employ a freedom that those believers are not even allowed,
in their own interests, to understand. Away, then, with the monastic
cowl of self-denial, with the appearance of humility! Much more and
much better—so rings our truth! If science were not linked with the
pleasure of knowledge, the utility of the thing known, what should we
care for science? If a little faith, love, and hope did not lead our
souls to knowledge, what would attract us to science? And if in science
the ego means nothing, still the inventive, happy ego, every upright and
industrious ego, means a great deal in the republic of the men of science.
The homage of those who pay homage, the joy of those whom we wish well
or honour, in some cases glory and a fair share of immortality, is the
personal reward for every suppression of personality: to say nothing here
of meaner views and rewards, although it is just on this account that the
majority have sworn and always continue to swear fidelity to the laws
of the republic and of science. If we had not remained in some degree
unscientific, what would science matter to us? Taking everything together
and speaking in plain language: “To a purely knowing being knowledge
would be indifferent.”—Not the quality but the quantity of faith and
devoutness distinguishes us from the pious, the believers. We are content
with less.  But should one of them cry out to us: “Be content and show
yourselves contented!” we could easily answer: “As a matter of fact,
we do not belong to the most discontented class. But you, if your faith
makes you happy, show yourselves to be happy. Your faces have always done
more harm to your faith than our reasons! If that glad message of your
Bible were written in your faces, you would not need to demand belief
in the authority of that book in such stiff-necked fashion. Your words,
your actions should continually make the Bible superfluous—in fact,
through you a new Bible should continually come into being. As it is,
your apologia for Christianity is rooted in your unchristianity, and with
your defence you write your own condemnation. If you, however, should
wish to emerge from your dissatisfaction with Christianity, you should
ponder over the experience of two thousand years, which, clothed in the
modest form of a question, may be voiced as follows: ‘If Christ really
intended to redeem the world, may he not be said to have failed?’ ”
%
All the surplus poetical force that still exists in modern humanity,
but is not used under our conditions of life, should (without any
deduction) be devoted to a definite goal—not to depicting the present
nor to reviving and summarising the past, but to pointing the way to the
future. Nor should this be so done as if the poet, like an imaginative
political economist, had to anticipate a more favourable national and
social state of things and picture their realisation. Rather will he,
just as the earlier poets portrayed the images of the Gods, portray the
fair images of men. He will divine those cases where, in the midst of
our modern world and reality (which will not be shirked or repudiated
in the usual poetic fashion), a great, noble soul is still possible,
where it may be embodied in harmonious, equable conditions, where it
may become permanent, visible, and representative of a type, and so,
by the stimulus to imitation and envy, help to create the future. The
poems of such a poet would be distinguished by appearing secluded and
protected from the heated atmosphere of the passions. The irremediable
failure, the shattering of all the strings of the human instrument,
the scornful laughter and gnashing of teeth, and all tragedy and comedy
in the usual old sense, would appear by the side of this new art as mere
archaic lumber, a blurring of the outlines of the world-picture. Strength,
kindness, gentleness, purity, and an unsought, innate moderation in the
personalities and their action: a levelled soil, giving rest and pleasure
to the foot: a shining heaven mirrored in faces and events: science and
art welded into a new unity: the mind living together with her sister,
the soul, without arrogance or jealousy, and enticing from contrasts
the grace of seriousness, not the impatience of discord—all this
would be the general environment, the background on which the delicate
differences of the embodied ideals would make the real picture, that of
ever-growing human majesty. Many roads to this poetry of the future start
from Goethe, but the quest needs good pathfinders and above all a far
greater strength than is possessed by modern poets, who unscrupulously
represent the half-animal and the immaturity and intemperance that are
mistaken by them for power and naturalness.
%
“Better to rot than to be a woman without charm.” When once the Muse
thinks thus, the end of her art is again at hand. But it can be a tragic
and also a comic finale.
%
If the beautiful is to be identified with that which gives pleasure—and
thus sang the Muses once—the useful is often the necessary circuitous
path to the beautiful, and has a perfect right to spurn the short-sighted
censure of men who live for the moment, who will not wait, and who think
that they can reach all good things without ever taking a circuitous path.
%
The ceaseless desire to create, the eternal looking outward of the artist,
hinders him from becoming better and more beautiful as a personality:
unless his craving for glory be great enough to compel him to exhibit
in his relations with other men a growth corresponding to the growing
beauty and greatness of his works. In any case he has but a limited
measure of strength, and how could the proportion of strength that he
spends on himself be of any benefit to his work—or _vice versa_?
%
If we have satisfied the best people of our time with our art, it is
a sign that we shall not satisfy the best people of the succeeding
period. We have indeed “lived for all time,” and the applause of
the best people ensures our fame.(10)
%
If we are of one substance with a book or a work of art, we think in our
heart of hearts that it must be excellent, and are offended if others
find it ugly, over-spiced, or pretentious.
%
That speech is not given to us to communicate our emotions may be seen
from the fact that all simple men are ashamed to seek for words to express
their deeper feelings. These feelings are expressed only in actions, and
even here such men blush if others seem to divine their motives. After
all, among poets, to whom God generally denies this shame, the more
noble are more monosyllabic in the language of emotion, and evince a
certain constraint: whereas the real poets of emotion are for the most
part shameless in practical life.
%
He that has not for a long time been completely weaned from an art, and
is still always at home in it, has no idea how small a privation it is
to live without that art.
%
A work that is meant to give an impression of health should be produced
with three-quarters, at the most, of the strength of its creator. If
he has gone to his farthest limit, the work excites the observer and
disconcerts him by its tension. All good things have something lazy
about them and lie like cows in the meadow.
%
As refined fare serves a hungry man as well as and no better than coarser
food, the more pretentious artist will not dream of inviting the hungry
man to his meal.
%
It is with works of art as with wine—it is better if one can do without
both and keep to water, and if from the inner fire and inner sweetness
of the soul the water spontaneously changes again into wine.
%
The pirate-genius in art, who even knows how to deceive subtle minds,
arises when some one unscrupulously and from youth upwards regards
all good things, that are not protected by law, as the property
of a particular person, as his legitimate spoil. Now all the good
things of past ages and masters lie free around us, hedged about and
protected by the reverential awe of the few who know them. To these
few our robber-genius, by the force of his impudence, bids defiance
and accumulates for himself a wealth that once more calls forth homage
and awe.
%
In the gardens of modern poetry it will clearly be observed that the
sewers of great towns are too near. With the fragrance of flowers is
mingled something that betrays abomination and putrescence. With pain I
ask: “Must you poets always request wit and dirt to stand godfather,
when an innocent and beautiful sensation has to be christened by
you? Are you obliged to dress your noble goddess in a hood of devilry
and caricature? But whence this necessity, this obligation?” The reason
is—because you live too near the sewers.
%
No one has ever explained why the Greek writers, having at command such
an unparalleled wealth and power of language, made so sparing a use of
their resources that every post-classical Greek book appears by comparison
crude, over-coloured, and extravagant. It is said that towards the North
Polar ice and in the hottest countries salt is becoming less and less
used, whereas on the other hand the dwellers on the plains and by the
coast in the more temperate zones use salt in great abundance. Is it
possible that the Greeks from a twofold reason—because their intellect
was colder and clearer but their fundamental passionate nature far more
tropical than ours—did not need salt and spice to the same extent that
we do?
%
In a book for free spirits one cannot avoid mention of Laurence Sterne,
the man whom Goethe honoured as the freest spirit of his century. May he
be satisfied with the honour of being called the freest writer of all
times, in comparison with whom all others appear stiff, square-toed,
intolerant, and downright boorish! In his case we should not speak of
the clear and rounded but of “the endless melody”—if by this phrase
we arrive at a name for an artistic style in which the definite form is
continually broken, thrust aside and transferred to the realm of the
indefinite, so that it signifies one and the other at the same time.
Sterne is the great master of _double entendre_, this phrase being
naturally used in a far wider sense than is commonly done when one applies
it to sexual relations. We may give up for lost the reader who always
wants to know exactly what Sterne thinks about a matter, and whether he be
making a serious or a smiling face (for he can do both with one wrinkling
of his features; he can be and even wishes to be right and wrong at the
same moment, to interweave profundity and farce). His digressions are
at once continuations and further developments of the story, his maxims
contain a satire on all that is sententious, his dislike of seriousness
is bound up with a disposition to take no matter merely externally
and on the surface. So in the proper reader he arouses a feeling of
uncertainty whether he be walking, lying, or standing, a feeling most
closely akin to that of floating in the air. He, the most versatile of
writers, communicates something of this versatility to his reader. Yes,
Sterne unexpectedly changes the parts, and is often as much reader as
author, his book being like a play within a play, a theatre audience
before another theatre audience. We must surrender at discretion to the
mood of Sterne, although we can always expect it to be gracious. It
is strangely instructive to see how so great a writer as Diderot has
affected this _double entendre_ of Sterne’s—to be equally ambiguous
throughout is just the Sternian super-humour. Did Diderot imitate,
admire, ridicule, or parody Sterne in his _Jacques le Fataliste_? One
cannot be exactly certain, and this uncertainty was perhaps intended
by the author. This very doubt makes the French unjust to the work of
one of their first masters, one who need not be ashamed of comparison
with any of the ancients or moderns. For humour (and especially for this
humorous attitude towards humour itself) the French are too serious. Is
it necessary to add that of all great authors Sterne is the worst model,
in fact the inimitable author, and that even Diderot had to pay for
his daring? What the worthy Frenchmen and before them some Greeks and
Romans aimed at and attained in prose is the very opposite of what Sterne
aims at and attains.  He raises himself as a masterly exception above
all that artists in writing demand of themselves—propriety, reserve,
character, steadfastness of purpose, comprehensiveness, perspicuity, good
deportment in gait and feature. Unfortunately Sterne the man seems to have
been only too closely related to Sterne the writer. His squirrel-soul
sprang with insatiable unrest from branch to branch; he knew what lies
between sublimity and rascality; he had sat on every seat, always with
unabashed watery eyes and mobile play of feature. He was—if language
does not revolt from such a combination—of a hard-hearted kindness,
and in the midst of the joys of a grotesque and even corrupt imagination
he showed the bashful grace of innocence. Such a carnal and spiritual
hermaphroditism, such untrammelled wit penetrating into every vein and
muscle, was perhaps never possessed by any other man.
%
Just as the good prose writer only takes words that belong to the language
of daily intercourse, though not by a long way all its words—whence
arises a choice style—so the good poet of the future will only represent
the real and turn his eyes away from all fantastic, superstitious,
half-voiced, forgotten stories, to which earlier poets devoted their
powers. Only reality, though by a long way not every reality—but a
choice reality.
%
Side by side with the genuine species of art, those of great repose and
great movement, there are degenerate species—weary, blasé art and
excited art. Both would have their weakness taken for strength and wish
to be confounded with the genuine species.
%
The typical poets and artists of our age like to compose their pictures
upon a background of shimmering red, green, grey, and gold, on the
background of nervous sensuality—a condition well understood by the
children of this century. The drawback comes when we do _not_ look at
these pictures with the eyes of our century. Then we see that the great
figures painted by these artists have something flickering, tremulous,
and dizzy about them, and accordingly we do not ascribe to them heroic
deeds, but at best mock-heroic, swaggering _mis_deeds.
%
The overladen style is a consequence of the impoverishment of the
organising force together with a lavish stock of expedients and
intentions. At the beginnings of art the very reverse conditions
sometimes appear.
%
_PULCHRUM EST PAUCORUM HOMINUM._—History and experience tell us that the
significant grotesqueness that mysteriously excites the imagination and
carries one beyond everyday reality, is older and grows more luxuriantly
than the beautiful and reverence for the beautiful in art: and that it
begins to flourish exceedingly when the sense for beauty is on the wane.
For the vast majority of mankind this grotesque seems to be a higher need
than the beautiful, presumably because it contains a coarser narcotic.
%
If we consider the primary germs of the artistic sense, and ask
ourselves what are the various kinds of joy produced by the firstlings
of art—as, for example, among savage tribes—we find first of all the
joy of understanding what another means. Art in this case is a sort of
conundrum, which causes its solver pleasure in his own quick and keen
perceptions.—Then the roughest works of art remind us of the pleasant
things we have actually experienced, and so give joy—as, for example,
when the artist alludes to a chase, a victory, a wedding.—Again, the
representation may cause us to feel excited, touched, inflamed, as for
instance in the glorification of revenge and danger. Here the enjoyment
lies in the excitement itself, in the victory over tedium.—The memory,
too, of unpleasant things, so far as they have been overcome or make
us appear interesting to the listener as subjects for art (as when the
singer describes the mishaps of a daring seaman), can inspire great joy,
the credit for which is given to art.—A more subtle variety is the joy
that arises at the sight of all that is regular and symmetrical in lines,
points, and rhythms. For by a certain analogy is awakened the feeling
for all that is orderly and regular in life, which one has to thank alone
for all well-being. So in the cult of symmetry we unconsciously do homage
to rule and proportion as the source of our previous happiness, and the
joy in this case is a kind of hymn of thanksgiving. Only when a certain
satiety of the last-mentioned joy arises does a more subtle feeling step
in, that enjoyment might even lie in a violation of the symmetrical and
regular. This feeling, for example, impels us to seek reason in apparent
unreason, and the sort of æsthetic riddle-guessing that results is in a
way the higher species of the first-named artistic joy.—He who pursues
this speculation still further will know what kind of hypotheses for
the explanation of æsthetic phenomena are hereby fundamentally rejected.
%
It is a disadvantage for good thoughts when they follow too closely on
one another, for they hide the view from each other. That is why great
artists and writers have made an abundant use of the mediocre.
%
Artists of all periods have made the discovery that in roughness lies
a certain strength, and that not every one can be rough who wants to
be: also that many varieties of weakness have a powerful effect on
the emotions. From this source are derived many artistic substitutes,
which not even the greatest and most conscientious artists can abstain
from using.
%
Many a man fails to become a thinker for the sole reason that his memory
is too good.
%
Great artists fancy that they have taken full possession of a soul. In
reality, and often to their painful disappointment, that soul has only
been made more capacious and insatiable, so that a dozen greater artists
could plunge into its depths without filling it up.
%
The anxiety lest people may not believe that their figures are _alive_
can mislead many artists of declining taste to portray these figures so
that they appear as if mad. From the same anxiety, on the other hand,
Greek artists of the earliest ages gave even dead and sorely wounded men
that smile which they knew as the most vivid sign of life—careless of
the actual forms bestowed by nature on life at its last gasp.
%
He who follows a philosophy or a genre of art to the end of its career and
beyond, understands from inner experience why the masters and disciples
who come after have so often turned, with a depreciatory gesture, into a
new groove. The circle must be described—but the individual, even the
greatest, sits firm on his point of the circumference, with an inexorable
look of obstinacy, as if the circle ought never to be completed.
%
Since every art becomes more and more adapted to the expression of
spiritual states, of the more lively, delicate, energetic, and passionate
states, the later masters, spoilt by these means of expression, do not
feel at their ease in the presence of the old-time works of art. They
feel as if the ancients had merely been lacking in the means of making
their souls speak clearly, also perhaps in some necessary technical
preliminaries. They think that they must render some assistance in this
quarter, for they believe in the similarity or even unity of all souls. In
truth, however, measure, symmetry, a contempt for graciousness and charm,
an unconscious severity and morning chilliness, an evasion of passion,
as if passion meant the death of art—such are the constituents of
sentiment and morality in all old masters, who selected and arranged
their means of expression not at random but in a necessary connection
with their morality. Knowing this, are we to deny those that come after
the right to animate the older works with their soul? No, for these works
can only survive through our giving them our soul, and our blood alone
enables them to speak to _us_. The real “historic” discourse would
talk ghostly speech to ghosts. We honour the great artists less by that
barren timidity that allows every word, every note to remain intact than
by energetic endeavours to aid them continually to a new life.—True,
if Beethoven were suddenly to come to life and hear one of his works
performed with that modern animation and nervous refinement that bring
glory to our masters of execution, he would probably be silent for a long
while, uncertain whether he should raise his hand to curse or to bless,
but perhaps say at last: “Well, well! That is neither I nor not-I,
but a third thing—it seems to me, too, something right, if not just
_the_ right thing. But you must know yourselves what to do, as in any
case it is you who have to listen. As our Schiller says, ‘the living
man is right.’ So have it your own way, and let me go down again.”
%
A brief dictum may be the fruit and harvest of long reflection. The
reader, however, who is a novice in this field and has never considered
the case in point, sees something embryonic in all brief dicta, not
without a reproachful hint to the author, requesting him not to serve
up such raw and ill-prepared food.
%
Do you think it is piece-work because it is (and must be) offered you
in pieces?
%
The worst readers of aphorisms are the friends of the author, if they
make a point of referring the general to the particular instance to
which the aphorism owes its origin. This namby-pamby attitude brings all
the author’s trouble to naught, and instead of a philosophic lesson
and a philosophic frame of mind, they deservedly gain nothing but the
satisfaction of a vulgar curiosity.
%
The reader offers a two-fold insult to the author by praising his second
book at the expense of his first (or _vice versa_) and by expecting the
author to be grateful to him on that account.
%
We fall into a state of terrible tension when we follow the history of an
art—as, for example, that of Greek oratory—and, passing from master to
master, observe their increasing precautions to obey the old and the new
laws and all these self-imposed limitations. We see that the bow _must_
snap, and that the so-called “loose” composition, with the wonderful
means of expression smothered and concealed (in this particular case
the florid style of Asianism), was once necessary and almost _beneficial_.
%
That enthusiasm for some object which you, O great man, introduce
into this world causes the intelligence of the many to be stunted. The
knowledge of this fact spells humiliation. But the enthusiast wears his
hump with pride and pleasure, and you have the consolation of feeling
that you have increased the world’s happiness.
%
The real fanatics of an artistic school are perhaps those utterly
inartistic natures that are not even grounded in the elements of
artistic study and creation, but are impressed with the strongest of
all the elementary influences of an art. For them there is no æsthetic
conscience—hence nothing to hold them back from fanaticism.
%
The artistic purpose followed by the new music, in what is now forcibly
but none too lucidly termed “endless melody,” can be understood by
going into the sea, gradually losing one’s firm tread on the bottom,
and finally surrendering unconditionally to the fluid element. One has
to _swim_. In the previous, older music one was forced, with delicate
or stately or impassioned movement, to _dance_. The measure necessary
for dancing, the observance of a distinct balance of time and force in
the soul of the hearer, imposed a continual self-control. Through the
counteraction of the cooler draught of air which came from this caution
and the warmer breath of musical enthusiasm, that music exercised its
spell.—Richard Wagner aimed at a different excitation of the soul,
allied, as above said, to swimming and floating. This is perhaps the
most essential of his innovations. His famous method, originating from
this aim and adapted to it—the “endless melody”—strives to
break and sometimes even to despise all mathematical equilibrium of
time and force. He is only too rich in the invention of such effects,
which sound to the old school like rhythmic paradoxes and blasphemies. He
dreads petrifaction, crystallisation, the development of music into the
architectural. He accordingly sets up a three-time rhythm in opposition
to the double-time, not infrequently introduces five-time and seven-time,
immediately repeats a phrase, but with a prolation, so that its time is
again doubled and trebled. From an easy-going imitation of such art may
arise a great danger to music, for by the side of the superabundance of
rhythmic emotion demoralisation and decadence lurk in ambush. The danger
will become very great if such music comes to associate itself more and
more closely with a quite naturalistic art of acting and pantomime,
trained and dominated by no higher plastic models; an art that knows
no measure in itself and can impart no measure to the kindred element,
the all-too-womanish nature of music.
%
The Muse of the poet who is not in love with reality will not be reality,
and will bear him children with hollow eyes and all too tender bones.
%
In art the end does not justify the means, but holy means can justify
the end.
%
The worst readers are those who act like plundering soldiers. They
take out some things that they might use, cover the rest with filth and
confusion, and blaspheme about the whole.
%
Good writers have two things in common: they prefer being understood to
being admired, and they do not write for the critical and over-shrewd
reader.
%
The mixed species in art bear witness to their authors’ distrust
of their own strength. They seek auxiliary powers, advocates,
hiding-places—such is the case with the poet who calls in philosophy,
the musician who calls in the drama, and the thinker who calls in rhetoric
to his aid.
%
When his book opens its mouth, the author must shut his.
%
All poets and men of letters who are in love with the superlative want
to do more than they can.
%
The deep thinker reckons on readers who feel with him the happiness
that lies in deep thinking. Hence a book that looks cold and sober, if
seen in the right light, may seem bathed in the sunshine of spiritual
cheerfulness and become a genuine soul-comforter.
%
The slow-witted thinker generally allies himself with loquacity and
ceremoniousness. By the former he thinks he is gaining mobility and
fluency, by the latter he gives his peculiarity the appearance of being
a result of free will and artistic purpose, with a view to dignity,
which needs slow movement.
%
_LE STYLE BAROQUE._(11)—He who as thinker and writer is not born or
trained to dialectic and the consecutive arrangement of ideas, will
unconsciously turn to the rhetoric and dramatic forms. For, after all,
his object is to make himself understood and to carry the day by force,
and he is indifferent whether, as shepherd, he honestly guides to himself
the hearts of his fellow-men, or, as robber, he captures them by surprise.
This is true of the plastic arts as of music: where the feeling of
insufficient dialectic or a deficiency in expression or narration,
together with an urgent, over-powerful impulse to form, gives birth to
that species of style known as “baroque.” Only the ill-educated and
the arrogant will at once find a depreciatory force in this word. The
baroque style always arises at the time of decay of a great art, when
the demands of art in classical expression have become too great. It
is a natural phenomenon which will be observed with melancholy—for
it is a forerunner of the night—but at the same time with admiration
for its peculiar compensatory arts of expression and narration. To this
style belongs already a choice of material and subjects of the highest
dramatic tension, at which the heart trembles even when there is no art,
because heaven and hell are all too near the emotions: then, the oratory
of strong passion and gestures, of ugly sublimity, of great masses,
in fact of absolute quantity _per se_ (as is shown in Michael Angelo,
the father or grandfather of the Italian baroque stylists): the lights of
dusk, illumination and conflagration playing upon those strongly moulded
forms: ever-new ventures in means and aims, strongly underscored by
artists for artists, while the layman must fancy he sees an unconscious
overflowing of all the horns of plenty of an original nature-art: all
these characteristics that constitute the greatness of that style are
neither possible nor permitted in the earlier ante-classical and classical
periods of a branch of art. Such luxuries hang long on the tree like
forbidden fruit. Just now, when music is passing into this last phase,
we may learn to know the phenomenon of the baroque style in peculiar
splendour, and, by comparison, find much that is instructive for earlier
ages. For from Greek times onward there has often been a baroque style,
in poetry, oratory, prose writing, sculpture, and, as is well known, in
architecture. This style, though wanting in the highest nobility,—the
nobility of an innocent, unconscious, triumphant perfection,—has
nevertheless given pleasure to many of the best and most serious minds
of their time. Hence, as aforesaid, it is presumptuous to depreciate it
without reserve, however happy we may feel because our taste for it has
not made us insensible to the purer and greater style.
%
Honest books make the reader honest, at least by exciting his hatred
and aversion, which otherwise cunning cleverness knows so well how to
conceal. Against a book, however, we let ourselves go, however restrained
we may be in our relations with men.
%
Individual fine passages, an exciting general tenor, a moving and
absorbing finale—so much of a work of art is accessible even to most
laymen. In an art period when it is desired to win over the great majority
of the laymen to the side of the artists and to make a party perhaps
for the very preservation of art, the creative artist will do well to
offer nothing more than the above. Then he will not be a squanderer
of his strength, in spheres where no one is grateful to him.  For to
perform the remaining functions, the imitation of Nature in her organic
development and growth, would in that case be like sowing seeds in water.
%
Every later master who leads the taste of art-lovers into his channel
unconsciously gives rise to a selection and revaluation of the older
masters and their works. Whatever in them is conformable and akin to him,
and anticipates and foreshadows him, appears henceforth as the only
important element in them and their works—a fruit in which a great
error usually lies hidden like a worm.
%
If we teach people by all the enchantments of artists and thinkers
to feel reverence for their defects, their intellectual poverty, their
absurd infatuations and passions (as it is quite possible to do); if we
show them only the lofty side of crime and folly, only the touching and
appealing element in weakness and flabbiness and blind devotion (that too
has often enough been done):—we have employed the means for inspiring
even an unphilosophical and inartistic age with an ecstatic love of
philosophy and art (especially of thinkers and artists as personalities)
and, in the worst case, perhaps with the only means of defending the
existence of such tender and fragile beings.
%
Criticism, one-sided and unjust as well as intelligent criticism, gives
so much pleasure to him who exercises it that the world is indebted
to every work and every action that inspires much criticism and many
critics. For criticism draws after it a glittering train of joyousness,
wit, self-admiration, pride, instruction, designs of improvement.—The
God of joy created the bad and the mediocre for the same reason that he
created the good.
%
When an artist wants to be more than an artist—for example, the moral
awakener of his people—he at last falls in love, as a punishment, with
a monster of moral substance. The Muse laughs, for, though a kind-hearted
Goddess, she can also be malignant from jealousy.  Milton and Klopstock
are cases in point.
%
The tendency of a talent towards moral subjects, characters, motives,
towards the “beautiful soul” of the work of art, is often only a
glass eye put on by the artist who lacks a beautiful soul. It may result,
though rarely, that his eye finally becomes living Nature, if indeed it
be Nature with a somewhat troubled look. But the ordinary result is that
the whole world thinks it sees Nature where there is only cold glass.
%
Writing should always indicate a victory, indeed a conquest of oneself
which must be communicated to others for their behoof. There are, however,
dyspeptic authors who only write when they cannot digest something,
or when something has remained stuck in their teeth. Through their anger
they try unconsciously to disgust the reader too, and to exercise violence
upon him—that is, they desire victory, but victory over others.
%
Every good book tastes bitter when it first comes out, for it has
the defect of newness. Moreover, it suffers damage from its living
author, if he is well known and much talked about. For all the world is
accustomed to confuse the author with his work. Whatever of profundity,
sweetness, and brilliance the work may contain must be developed as the
years go by, under the care of growing, then old, and lastly traditional
reverence. Many hours must pass, many a spider must have woven its web
about the book. A book is made better by good readers and clearer by
good opponents.
%
Artists well understand the idea of using extravagance as an artistic
means in order to convey an impression of wealth. This is one of those
innocent wiles of soul-seduction that the artist must know, for in his
world, which has only appearance in view, the means to appearance need
not necessarily be genuine.
%
Genius, by virtue of its more ample drapery, knows better than talent
how to hide its barrel-organ. Yet after all it too can only play its
seven old pieces over and over again.
%
It is now a matter of custom and almost of duty for the author’s
name to appear on the book, and this is a main cause of the fact
that books have so little influence. If they are good, they are worth
more than the personalities of their authors, of which they are the
quintessences. But as soon as the author makes himself known on the
title-page, the quintessence, from the reader’s point of view, becomes
diluted with the personal, the most personal element, and the aim of
the book is frustrated. It is the ambition of the intellect no longer
to appear individual.
%
We make the most cutting criticism of a man or a book when we indicate
his or its ideal.
%
Every good book is written for a particular reader and men of his stamp,
and for that very reason is looked upon unfavourably by all other readers,
by the vast majority. Its reputation accordingly rests on a narrow basis
and must be built up by degrees.—The mediocre and bad book is mediocre
and bad because it seeks to please, and does please, a great number.
%
The danger of the new music lies in the fact that it puts the cup of
rapture and exaltation to the lips so invitingly, and with such a show
of moral ecstasy, that even the noble and temperate man always drinks a
drop too much. This minimum of intemperance, constantly repeated, can
in the end bring about a deeper convulsion and destruction of mental
health than any coarse excess could do. Hence nothing remains but some
day to fly from the grotto of the nymph, and through perils and billowy
seas to forge one’s way to the smoke of Ithaca and the embraces of a
simpler and more human spouse.
%
A book full of intellect communicates something thereof even to its
opponents.
%
To criticise a book means, for the young, not to let oneself be touched
by a single productive thought therefrom, and to protect one’s skin
with hands and feet. The youngster lives in opposition to all novelty
that he cannot love in the lump, in a position of self-defence, and in
this connection he commits, as often as he can, a superfluous sin.
%
The greatest paradox in the history of poetic art lies in this: that
in all that constitutes the greatness of the old poets a man may be a
barbarian, faulty and deformed from top to toe, and still remain the
greatest of poets. This is the case with Shakespeare, who, as compared
with Sophocles, is like a mine of immeasurable wealth in gold, lead,
and rubble, whereas Sophocles is not merely gold, but gold in its noblest
form, one that almost makes us forget the money-value of the metal. But
quantity in its highest intensity has the same effect as quality. That
is a good thing for Shakespeare.
%
The Poet can choose whether to raise emotion from one grade to another,
and so finally to exalt it to a great height—or to try a surprise
attack, and from the start to pull the bell-rope with might and main. Both
processes have their danger—in the first case his hearer may run away
from him through boredom, in the second through terror.
%
Insects sting, not from malice, but because they too want to live. It
is the same with our critics—they desire our blood, not our pain.
%
The inexperienced, when an aphorism at once illuminates their minds
with its naked truth, always think that it is old and well known. They
look askance at the author, as if he had wanted to steal the common
property of all, whereas they enjoy highly spiced half-truths, and give
the author to understand as much. He knows how to appreciate the hint,
and easily guesses thereby where he has succeeded and failed.
%
An artist who exceeds the limit of his strength in all that he undertakes
will end by carrying the multitude along with him through the spectacle of
violent wrestling that he affords. Success is not always the accompaniment
only of victory, but also of the desire for victory.
%
_SIBI SCRIBERE._—The sensible author writes for no other posterity
than his own—that is, for his age—so as to be able even then to take
pleasure in himself.
%
A good aphorism is too hard for the tooth of time, and is not worn away
by all the centuries, although it serves as food for every epoch. Hence
it is the greatest paradox in literature, the imperishable in the midst
of change, the nourishment which always remains highly valued, as salt
does, and never becomes stupid like salt.
%
The people may have something of what can be called art-need, but it is
small, and can be cheaply satisfied. On the whole, the remnant of art
(it must be honestly confessed) suffices for this need. Let us consider,
for example, the kind of melodies and songs in which the most vigorous,
unspoiled, and true-hearted classes of the population find genuine
delight; let us live among shepherds, cowherds, peasants, huntsmen,
soldiers, and sailors, and give ourselves the answer.  And in the country
town, just in the houses that are the homes of inherited civic virtue, is
it not the worst music at present produced that is loved and, one might
say, cherished? He who speaks of deeper needs and unsatisfied yearnings
for art among the people, as it is, is a crank or an impostor. Be
honest! Only in exceptional men is there now an art-need in the highest
sense—because art is once more on the down-grade, and human powers
and hopes are for the time being directed to other matters.—Apart
from this, outside the populace, there exists indeed, in the higher and
highest strata of society, a broader and more comprehensive art-need,
but _of the second order_. Here there is a sort of artistic commune,
which possibly means to be sincere. But let us look at the elements! They
are in general the more refined malcontents, who attain no genuine
pleasure in themselves; the cultured, who have not become free enough
to dispense with the consolations of religion, and yet do not find its
incense sufficiently fragrant; the half-aristocratic, who are too weak
to combat by a heroic conversion or renunciation the one fundamental
error of their lives or the pernicious bent of their characters; the
highly gifted, who think themselves too dignified to be of service
by modest activity, and are too lazy for real, self-sacrificing work;
girls who cannot create for themselves a satisfactory sphere of duties;
women who have tied themselves by a light-hearted or nefarious marriage,
and know that they are not tied securely enough; scholars, physicians,
merchants, officials who specialised too early and never gave their lives
a free enough scope—who do their work efficiently, it is true, but with
a worm gnawing at their hearts; finally, all imperfect artists—these
are nowadays the true needers of art! What do they really desire from
art? Art is to drive away hours and moments of discomfort, boredom,
half-bad conscience, and, if possible, transform the faults of their
lives and characters into faults of world-destiny. Very different were
the Greeks, who realised in their art the outflow and overflow of their
own sense of well-being and health, and loved to see their perfection
once more from a standpoint outside themselves. They were led to art by
delight in themselves; our contemporaries—by disgust of themselves.
%
The real theatrical talent of the Germans was Kotzebue. He and his
Germans, those of higher as well as those of middle-class society, were
necessarily associated, and his contemporaries should have said of him
in all seriousness, “in him we live and move and have our being.”
Here was nothing—no constraint, pretence, or half-enjoyment: what he
could and would do was understood. Yes, until now the honest theatrical
success on the German stage has been in the hands of the shamefaced
or unashamed heirs of Kotzebue’s methods and influence—that is,
as far as comedy still flourishes at all. The result is that much of
the Germanism of that age, sometimes far off from the great towns, still
survives. Good-natured; incontinent in small pleasures; always ready for
tears; with the desire, in the theatre at any rate, to be able to get
rid of their innate sobriety and strict attention to duty and exercise;
a smiling, nay, a laughing indulgence; confusing goodness and sympathy
and welding them into one, as is the essential characteristic of German
sentimentality; exceedingly happy at a noble, magnanimous action; for
the rest, submissive towards superiors, envious of each other, and yet
in their heart of hearts thoroughly self-satisfied—such were they and
such was he.—The second dramatic talent was Schiller. He discovered a
class of hearers which had hitherto never been taken into consideration:
among the callow German youth of both sexes. His poetry responded to
their higher, nobler, more violent if more confused emotions, their
delight in the jingle of moral words (a delight that begins to disappear
when we reach the thirties). Thus he won for himself, by virtue of the
passionateness and partisanship of the young, a success which gradually
reacted with advantage upon those of riper years. Generally speaking,
Schiller rejuvenated the Germans. Goethe stood and still stands above the
Germans in every respect. To them he will never belong. How could a nation
in well-being and well-wishing come up to the intellectuality of Goethe?
Beethoven composed and Schopenhauer philosophised above the heads of the
Germans, and it was above their heads, in the same way, that Goethe wrote
his _Tasso_, his _Iphigenie_. He was followed by a small company of highly
cultured persons, who were educated by antiquity, life, and travel, and
had grown out of German ways of thought. He himself did not wish it to be
otherwise.—When the Romantics set up their well-conceived Goethe cult;
when their amazing skill in appreciation was passed on to the disciples
of Hegel, the real educators of the Germans of this century; when the
awakening national ambition turned out advantageous to the fame of the
German poets; when the real standard of the nation, as to whether it could
honestly find enjoyment in anything, became inexorably subordinated to the
judgment of individuals and to that national ambition,—that is, when
people began to enjoy by compulsion,—then arose that false, spurious
German culture which was ashamed of Kotzebue; which brought Sophocles,
Calderon, and even the Second Part of Goethe’s _Faust_ on the stage;
and which, on account of its foul tongue and congested stomach, no longer
knows now what it likes and what it finds tedious.—Happy are those who
have taste, even if it be a bad taste! Only by this characteristic can
one be wise as well as happy. Hence the Greeks, who were very refined in
such matters, designated the sage by a word that means “man of taste,”
and called wisdom, artistic as well as scientific, “taste” (_sophia_).
%
Among all the arts that are accustomed to grow on a definite culture-soil
and under definite social and political conditions, music is the last
plant to come up, arising in the autumn and fading-season of the culture
to which it belongs. At the same time, the first signs and harbingers
of a new spring are usually already noticeable, and sometimes music,
like the language of a forgotten age, rings out into a new, astonished
world, and comes too late. In the art of the Dutch and Flemish musicians
the soul of the Christian middle ages at last found its fullest tone:
their sound-architecture is the posthumous but legitimate and equal
sister of Gothic. Not until Handel’s music was heard the note of the
best in the soul of Luther and his kin, the great Judæo-heroical impulse
that created the whole Reformation movement. Mozart first expressed in
golden melody the age of Louis XIV.  and the art of Racine and Claude
Lorrain. The eighteenth century—that century of rhapsody, of broken
ideals and transitory happiness—only sang itself out in the music of
Beethoven and Rossini. A lover of sentimental similes might say that
all really important music was a swan-song.—Music is, in fact, not
a universal language for all time, as is so often said in its praise,
but responds exactly to a particular period and warmth of emotion which
involves a quite definite, individual culture, determined by time
and place, as its inner law. The music of Palestrina would be quite
unintelligible to a Greek; and again, what would the music of Rossini
convey to Palestrina?—It may be that our most modern German music, with
all its pre-eminence and desire of pre-eminence, will soon be no longer
understood. For this music sprang from a culture that is undergoing a
rapid decay, from the soil of that epoch of reaction and restoration
in which a certain Catholicism of feeling, as well as a delight in all
indigenous, national, primitive manners, burst into bloom and scattered
a blended perfume over Europe. These two emotional tendencies, adopted
in their greatest strength and carried to their farthest limits, found
final expression in the music of Wagner. Wagner’s predilection for
the old native sagas, his free idealisation of their unfamiliar gods
and heroes,—who are really sovereign beasts of prey with occasional
fits of thoughtfulness, magnanimity, and boredom,—his re-animation
of those figures, to which he gave in addition the mediæval Christian
thirst for ecstatic sensuality and spiritualisation—all this Wagnerian
give-and-take with regard to materials, souls, figures, and words—would
clearly express the spirit of his music, if it could not, like all
music, speak quite unambiguously of itself. This spirit wages the last
campaign of reaction against the spirit of illumination which passed
into this century from the last, and also against the super-national
ideas of French revolutionary romanticism and of English and American
insipidity in the reconstruction of state and society.—But is it not
evident that the spheres of thought and emotion apparently suppressed by
Wagner and his school have long since acquired fresh strength, and that
his late musical protest against them generally rings into ears that
prefer to hear different and opposite notes; so that one day that high
and wonderful art will suddenly become unintelligible and will be covered
by the spider’s web of oblivion?—In considering this state of affairs
we must not let ourselves be led astray by those transitory fluctuations
which arise like a reaction within a reaction, as a temporary sinking
of the mountainous wave in the midst of the general upheaval. Thus,
this decade of national war, ultramontane martyrdom, and socialistic
unrest may, in its remoter after-effect, even aid the Wagnerian art to
acquire a sudden halo, without guaranteeing that it “has a future”
or that it has _the_ future. It is in the very nature of music that the
fruits of its great culture-vintage should lose their taste and wither
earlier than the fruits of the plastic arts or those that grow on the
tree of knowledge. Among all the products of the human artistic sense
ideas are the most solid and lasting.
%
Strange as it may sound to our time, there were once poets and artists
whose soul was above the passions with their delights and convulsions, and
who therefore took their pleasure in purer materials, worthier men, more
delicate complications and dénouements. If the artists of our day for
the most part unfetter the will, and so are under certain circumstances
for that very reason emancipators of life, those were tamers of the
will, enchanters of animals, creators of men. In fact, they moulded,
re-moulded, and new-moulded life, whereas the fame of poets of our day
lies in unharnessing, unchaining, and shattering.—The ancient Greeks
demanded of the poet that he should be the teacher of grown men. How
ashamed the poet would be now if this demand were made of him! He is not
even a good student of himself, and so never himself becomes a good poem
or a fine picture. Under the most favourable circumstances he remains
the shy, attractive ruin of a temple, but at the same time a cavern of
cravings, overgrown like a ruin with flowers, nettles, and poisonous
weeds, inhabited and haunted by snakes, worms, spiders, and birds; an
object for sad reflection as to why the noblest and most precious must
grow up at once like a ruin, without the past and future of perfection.
%
An art like that which streams out of Homer, Sophocles, Theocritus,
Calderon, Racine, Goethe, as the superabundance of a wise and harmonious
conduct of life—that is the true art, at which we grasp when we have
ourselves become wiser and more harmonious. It is not that barbaric,
if ever so delightful, outpouring of hot and highly coloured things
from an undisciplined, chaotic soul, which is what we understood by
“art” in our youth. It is obvious from the nature of the case that
for certain periods of life an art of overstrain, excitement, antipathy
to the orderly, monotonous, simple, logical, is an inevitable need, to
which artists must respond, lest the soul of such periods should unburden
itself in other ways, through all kinds of disorder and impropriety. Hence
youths as they generally are, full, fermenting, tortured above all things
by boredom, and women who lack work that fully occupies their soul,
require that art of delightful disorder. All the more violently on that
account are they inflamed with a desire for satisfaction without change,
happiness without stupor and intoxication.
%
Art is above all and first of all meant to embellish life, to make us
ourselves endurable and if possible agreeable in the eyes of others. With
this task in view, art moderates us and holds us in restraint, creates
forms of intercourse, binds over the uneducated to laws of decency,
cleanliness, politeness, well-timed speech and silence. Hence art
must conceal or transfigure everything that is ugly—the painful,
terrible, and disgusting elements which in spite of every effort will
always break out afresh in accordance with the very origin of human
nature. Art has to perform this duty especially in regard to the passions
and spiritual agonies and anxieties, and to cause the significant factor
to shine through unavoidable or unconquerable ugliness.  To this great,
super-great task the so-called art proper, that of works of art, is a
mere accessary. A man who feels within himself a surplus of such powers
of embellishment, concealment, and transfiguration will finally seek
to unburden himself of this surplus in works of art. The same holds
good, under special circumstances, of a whole nation.—But as a rule
we nowadays begin art at the end, hang on to its tail, and think that
works of art constitute art proper, and that life should be improved
and transformed by this means—fools that we are! If we begin a dinner
with dessert, and try sweet after sweet, small wonder that we ruin our
digestions and even our appetites for the good, hearty, nourishing meal
to which art invites us!
%
Why, really, does a creative art nowadays continue to exist? Because the
majority who have hours of leisure (and such an art is for them only)
think that they cannot fill up their time without music, theatres and
picture-galleries, novels and poetry. Granted that one could keep them
from this indulgence, either they would strive less eagerly for leisure,
and the invidious sight of the rich would be less common (a great gain
for the stability of society), or they would have leisure, but would
learn to reflect on what can be learnt and unlearnt: on their work,
for instance, their associations, the pleasure they could bestow. All
the world, with the exception of the artist, would in both cases reap
the advantage.—Certainly, there are many vigorous, sensible readers
who could take objection to this. Still, it must be said on behalf
of the coarse and malignant that the author himself is concerned with
this protest, and that there is in his book much to be read that is not
actually written down therein.
%
The poet expresses the universal higher opinions of the nation, he is its
mouthpiece and flute; but by virtue of metre and all other artistic means
he so expresses them that the nation regards them as something quite new
and wonderful, and believes in all seriousness that he is the mouthpiece
of the Gods. Yes, under the clouds of creation the poet himself forgets
whence he derives all his intellectual wisdom—from father and mother,
from teachers and books of all kinds, from the street and particularly
from the priest. He is deceived by his own art, and really believes,
in a naïve period, that a God is speaking through him, that he is
creating in a state of religious inspiration. As a matter of fact,
he is only saying what he has learnt, a medley of popular wisdom and
popular foolishness. Hence, so far as a poet is really _vox populi_
he is held to be _vox dei_.
%
The last and hardest task of the artist is the presentment of what
remains the same, reposes in itself, is lofty and simple and free from
the bizarre. Hence the noblest forms of moral perfection are rejected
as inartistic by weaker artists, because the sight of these fruits
is too painful for their ambition. The fruit gleams at them from the
topmost branches of art, but they lack the ladder, the courage, the grip
to venture so high. In himself a Phidias is quite possible as a poet,
but, if modern strength be taken into consideration, almost solely in
the sense that to God nothing is impossible. The desire for a poetical
Claude Lorrain is already an immodesty at present, however earnestly one
man’s heart may yearn for such a consummation.—The presentment of
the highest man, the most simple and at the same time the most complete,
has hitherto been beyond the scope of all artists. Perhaps, however,
the Greeks, in the ideal of Athene, saw farther than any men did before
or after their time.
%
The retrograde movements in history, the so-called periods of restoration,
which try to revive intellectual and social conditions that existed
before those immediately preceding,—and seem really to succeed in giving
them a brief resurrection,—have the charm of sentimental recollection,
ardent longing for what is almost lost, hasty embracing of a transitory
happiness. It is on account of this strange trend towards seriousness that
in such transient and almost dreamy periods art and poetry find a natural
soil, just as the tenderest and rarest plants grow on mountain-slopes
of steep declivity.—Thus many a good artist is unwittingly impelled to
a “restoration” way of thinking in politics and society, for which,
on his own account, he prepares a quiet little corner and garden. Here
he collects about himself the human remains of the historical epoch
that appeals to him, and plays his lyre to many who are dead, half-dead,
and weary to death, perhaps with the above-mentioned result of a brief
resurrection.
%
In two respects our age is to be accounted happy.  With respect to
the _past_, we enjoy all cultures and their productions, and nurture
ourselves on the noblest blood of all periods. We stand sufficiently
near to the magic of the forces from whose womb these periods are born
to be able in passing to submit to their spell with pleasure and terror;
whereas earlier cultures could only enjoy themselves, and never looked
beyond themselves, but were rather overarched by a bell of broader
or narrower dome, through which indeed light streamed down to them,
but which their gaze could not pierce. With respect to the _future_,
there opens out to us for the first time a mighty, comprehensive vista
of human and economic purposes engirdling the whole inhabited globe. At
the same time, we feel conscious of a power ourselves to take this
new task in hand without presumption, without requiring supernatural
aids. Yes, whatever the result of our enterprise, however much we may
have overestimated our strength, at any rate we need render account to
no one but ourselves, and mankind can henceforth begin to do with itself
what it will.—There are, it is true, peculiar human bees, who only
know how to suck the bitterest and worst elements from the chalice of
every flower. It is true that all flowers contain something that is not
honey, but these bees may be allowed to feel in their own way about the
happiness of our time, and continue to build up their hive of discomfort.
%
Hours of instruction and meditation for adults, even the most mature,
and such institutions visited without compulsion but in accordance
with the moral injunction of the whole community; the churches as the
meeting-places most worthy and rich in memories for the purpose; at the
same time daily festivals in honour of the reason that is attained and
attainable by man; a newer and fuller budding and blooming of the ideal
of the teacher, in which the clergyman, the artist and the physician,
the man of science and the sage are blended, and their individual virtues
should come to the fore as a collective virtue in their teaching itself,
in their discourses, in their method—this is my ever-recurring vision,
of which I firmly believe that it has raised a corner of the veil of
the future.
%
The extraordinary haphazardness of the whole system of education, which
leads every adult to say nowadays that his sole educator was chance, and
the weathercock-nature of educational methods and aims, may be explained
as follows. The oldest and the newest culture-powers, as in a turbulent
mass-meeting, would rather be heard than understood, and wish to prove
at all costs by their outcries and clamourings that they still exist or
already exist. The poor teachers and educators are first dazed by this
senseless noise, then become silent and finally apathetic, allowing
anything to be done to them just as they in their turn allow anything
to be done to their pupils. They are not trained themselves, so how are
they to train others? They are themselves no straight-growing, vigorous,
succulent trees, and he who wishes to attach himself to them must wind
and bend himself and finally become distorted and deformed as they.
%
Rhapsody and frigidity, burning desires and waning of the heart’s
glow—this wretched medley is to be found in the picture of the highest
European society of the present day. There the artist thinks that he
is achieving a great deal when through his art he lights the torch of
the heart as well as the torch of desire. The philosopher has the same
notion, when in the chilliness of his heart, which he has in common
with his age, he cools hot desires in himself and his following by his
world-denying judgments.
%
At last people are learning what it costs us so dear not to know in our
youth—that we must first do superior actions and secondly seek the
superior wherever and under whatever names it is to be found; that we
must at once go out of the way of all badness and mediocrity _without
fighting it_; and that even doubt as to the excellence of a thing (such
as quickly arises in one of practised taste) should rank as an argument
against it and a reason for completely avoiding it. We must not shrink
from the danger of occasionally making a mistake and confounding the less
accessible good with the bad and imperfect. Only he who can do nothing
better should attack the world’s evils as the soldier of culture. But
those who should support culture and spread its teachings ruin themselves
if they go about armed, and by precautions, night-watches, and bad dreams
turn the peace of their domestic and artistic life into sinister unrest.
%
Natural history, like the history of the war and victory of moral and
intellectual forces in the campaign against anxiety, self-delusion,
laziness, superstition, folly, should be so expounded that every reader or
listener may be continually aroused to strive after mental and physical
health and soundness, after the feeling of joy, and be awakened to the
desire to be the heir and continuator of mankind, to an ever nobler
adventurous impulse. Hitherto natural history has not found its true
language, because the inventive and eloquent artists—who are needed for
this purpose—never rid themselves of a secret mistrust of it, and above
all never wish to learn from it a thorough lesson. Nevertheless it must be
conceded to the English that their scientific manuals for the lower strata
of the people have made admirable strides towards that ideal. But then
such books are written by their foremost men of learning, full, complete,
and inspiring natures, and not, as among us, by mediocre investigators.
%
If genius, according to Schopenhauer’s observation, lies in the coherent
and vivid recollection of our own experience, a striving towards genius
in humanity collectively might be deduced from the striving towards
knowledge of the whole historic past—which is beginning to mark off
the modern age more and more as compared with earlier ages and has for
the first time broken down the barriers between nature and spirit, men
and animals, morality and physics. A perfectly conceived history would
be cosmic self-consciousness.
%
On great minds is bestowed the terrifying all-too-human of their natures,
their blindnesses, deformities, and extravagances, so that their more
powerful, easily all-too-powerful influence may be continually held
within bounds through the distrust aroused by such qualities. For the
sum-total of all that humanity needs for its continued existence is so
comprehensive, and demands powers so diverse and so numerous, that for
every one-sided predilection, whether in science or politics or art or
commerce, to which such natures would persuade us, mankind as a whole has
to pay a heavy price. It has always been a great disaster to culture when
human beings are worshipped. In this sense we may understand the precept
of Mosaic law which forbids us to have any other gods but God.—Side
by side with the cult of genius and violence we must always place, as
its complement and remedy, the cult of culture.  This cult can find an
intelligent appreciation even for the material, the inferior, the mean,
the misunderstood, the weak, the imperfect, the one-sided, the incomplete,
the untrue, the apparent, even the wicked and horrible, and can grant them
the concession that _all this is necessary_.  For the continued harmony
of all things human, attained by amazing toil and strokes of luck,
and just as much the work of Cyclopes and ants as of geniuses, shall
never be lost. How, indeed, could we dispense with that deep, universal,
and often uncanny bass, without which, after all, melody cannot be melody?
%
The man of the antique world understood better how to rejoice,
we understand better how to grieve less. They continually found new
motives for feeling happy, for celebrating festivals, being inventive
with all their wealth of shrewdness and reflection. We, on the other
hand, concentrate our intellect rather on the solving of problems which
have in view painlessness and the removal of sources of discomfort. With
regard to suffering existence, the ancients sought to forget or in some
way to convert the sensation into a pleasant one, thus trying to supply
palliatives. We attack the causes of suffering, and on the whole prefer
to use prophylactics.—Perhaps we are only building upon a foundation
whereon a later age will once more set up the temple of joy.
%
“We know how to tell many lies,” so sang the Muses once, when they
revealed themselves to Hesiod.—The conception of the artist as deceiver,
once grasped, leads to important discoveries.
%
Is there anything more desperate, more horrible, more incredible, shining
over human destiny like a winter sun, than that idea of Homer’s: “So
the decree of the Gods willed it, and doomed man to perish, that it might
be a matter for song even to distant generations”?  In other words,
we suffer and perish so that poets may not lack material, and this is
the dispensation of those very Gods of Homer who seem much concerned
about the joyousness of generations to come, but very little about us
men of the present. To think that such ideas should ever have entered
the head of a Greek!
%
Many ideas have come into the world as errors and fancies but have turned
out truths, because men have afterwards given them a genuine basis to
rest upon.
%
He who has not realised that every great man must not only be encouraged
but also, for the sake of the common welfare, opposed, is certainly
still a great child—or himself a great man.
%
Genius is most unjust towards geniuses, if they be contemporary. Either
it thinks it has no need of them and considers them superfluous (for it
can do without them), or their influence crosses the path of its electric
current, in which case it even calls them pernicious.
%
He has worked twenty years to convince his contemporaries, and succeeds
at last, but in the meantime his adversaries have also succeeded—he
is no longer convinced of himself.
%
In every philosophical school three thinkers follow one another in this
relation: the first produces from himself sap and seed, the second draws
it out in threads and spins a cunning web, the third waits in this web for
the victims who are caught in it—and tries to live upon this philosophy.
%
It is as bad a habit to go about with an author grasping him by the nose
as grasping him by the horn (and every author has his horn).
%
Vagueness of thought and outbursts of sentimentality are as often wedded
to the reckless desire to have one’s own way by hook or by crook, to
make oneself alone of any consequence, as a genuinely helpful, gracious,
and kindly spirit is wedded to the impulse towards clearness and purity
of thought and towards emotional moderation and self-restraint.
%
Surely it is in the heads of men that there arises the force that
binds them—an understanding of their common interest or the reverse;
and in their hearts the force that separates them—a blind choosing
and groping in love and hate, a devotion to one at the expense of all,
and a consequent contempt for the common utility.
%
There are curious marksmen who miss their mark, but leave the
shooting-gallery with secret pride in the fact that their bullet at any
rate flew very far (beyond the mark, it is true), or that it did not
hit the mark but hit something else. There are thinkers of the same stamp.
%
We act as enemies towards an intellectual tendency or movement when we
are superior to it and disapprove of its aim, or when its aim is too
high and unrecognisable to our eye—in other words, when it is superior
to us. So the same party may be attacked from two sides, from above
and from below. Not infrequently the assailants, from common hatred,
form an alliance which is more repulsive than all that they hate.
%
Original minds are distinguished not by being the first to see a new
thing, but by seeing the old, well-known thing, which is seen and
overlooked by every one, as something new. The first discoverer is
usually that quite ordinary and unintellectual visionary—chance.
%
The philosopher believes that the value of his philosophy lies in the
whole, in the structure. Posterity finds it in the stone with which he
built and with which, from that time forth, men will build oftener and
better—in other words, in the fact that the structure may be destroyed
and yet have value as material.
%
Wit is the epitaph of an emotion.
%
In science it occurs every day and every hour that a man, immediately
before the solution, remains stuck, being convinced that his efforts
have been entirely in vain—like one who, in untying a noose, hesitates
at the moment when it is nearest to coming loose, because at that very
moment it looks most like a knot.
%
The thoughtful man, and he who is sure of his intelligence, may profitably
consort with visionaries for a decade and abandon himself in their
torrid zone to a moderate insanity. He will thus have travelled a good
part of the road towards that cosmopolitanism of the intellect which
can say without presumption, “Nothing intellectual is alien to me.”
%
The best and healthiest element in science as amid the mountains is
the keen air that plays about it.—Intellectual molly-coddles (such as
artists) dread and abuse science on account of this atmosphere.
%
Science requires nobler natures than does poetry; natures that are
more simple, less ambitious, more restrained, calmer, that think
less of posthumous fame and can bury themselves in studies which,
in the eye of the many, scarcely seem worthy of such a sacrifice of
personality. There is another loss of which they are conscious. The nature
of their occupation, its continual exaction of the greatest sobriety,
weakens their will; the fire is not kept up so vigorously as on the
hearths of poetic minds. As such, they often lose their strength and
prime earlier than artists do—and, as has been said, they are aware
of their danger. Under all circumstances they seem less gifted because
they shine less, and thus they will always be rated below their value.
%
In later centuries the great man is credited with all the great qualities
and virtues of his century. Thus all that is best is continually obscured
by piety, which treats the picture as a sacred one, to be surrounded with
all manner of votive offerings. In the end the picture is completely
veiled and covered by the offerings, and thenceforth is more an object
of faith than of contemplation.
%
If we make truth stand on its head, we generally fail to notice that
our own head, too, is not in its right position.
%
The obvious satisfaction of the individual with his own form excites
imitation and gradually creates the form of the many—that is,
fashion. The many desire, and indeed attain, that same comforting
satisfaction with their own form. Consider how many reasons every man
has for anxiety and shy self-concealment, and how, on this account,
three-fourths of his energy and goodwill is crippled and may become
unproductive! So we must be very grateful to fashion for unfettering
that three-fourths and communicating self-confidence and the power of
cheerful compromise to those who feel themselves bound to each other by
its law. Even foolish laws give freedom and calm of the spirit, so long
as many persons have submitted to their sway.
%
The value of many men and books rests solely on their faculty for
compelling all to speak out the most hidden and intimate things. They are
looseners of tongues and crowbars to open the most stubborn teeth. Many
events and misdeeds which are apparently only sent as a curse to mankind
possess this value and utility.
%
Who of us could dare to call himself a “free spirit” if he could not
render homage after his fashion, by taking on his own shoulders a portion
of that burden of public dislike and abuse, to men to whom this name is
attached as a reproach? We might as well call ourselves in all seriousness
“spirits free of domicile” (_Freizügig_) (and without that arrogant
or high-spirited defiance) because we feel the impulse to freedom (_Zug
zur Freiheit_) as the strongest instinct of our minds and, in contrast
to fixed and limited minds, practically see our ideal in an intellectual
nomadism—to use a modest and almost depreciatory expression.
%
What Homer says on this point goes right to our heart, so true, so
terrible is it: “The Muse loved him with all her heart and gave him
good and evil, for she took away his eyes and vouchsafed him sweet
song.” This is an endless text for thinking men: she gives good and
evil, that is _her_ manner of loving with all her heart and soul! And
each man will interpret specially for himself why we poets and thinkers
have to give up our eyes in her service.(13)
%
The artistic training of the eye from childhood upwards by means of
drawing, painting, landscape-sketching, figures, scenes, involves an
estimable gain in life, making the eyesight keen, calm, and enduring in
the observation of men and circumstances. No similar secondary advantage
arises from the artistic cultivation of the ear, whence public schools
will generally do well to give the art of the eye a preference over that
of the ear.
%
Subtle minds, from which nothing is farther than trivialities, often
discover a triviality after taking all manner of circuitous routes and
mountain paths, and, to the astonishment of the non-subtle, rejoice
exceedingly.
%
A regular and rapid advance in the sciences is only possible when
the individual is compelled to be not so distrustful as to test every
calculation and assertion of others, in fields which are remote from
his own. A necessary condition, however, is that every man should have
competitors in his own sphere, who are extremely distrustful and keep a
sharp eye upon him. From this juxtaposition of “not too distrustful”
and “extremely distrustful” arises sincerity in the republic of
learning.
%
There are highly gifted minds which are always sterile only because,
from temperamental weakness, they are too impatient to wait for their
pregnancy.
%
The manifold discomforts which the demands of higher culture cause to
man finally pervert his nature to such an extent that he usually keeps
himself stoical and unbending. Thus he has tears in reserve only for rare
occasions of happiness, so that many must weep even at the enjoyment of
painlessness—only when happy does his heart still beat.
%
When we speak of the Greeks we unwittingly speak of to-day and yesterday;
their universally known history is a blank mirror, always reflecting
something that is not in the mirror itself. We enjoy the freedom of
speaking about them in order to have the right of being silent about
others—so that these Greeks themselves may whisper something in the
ear of the reflective reader. Thus the Greeks facilitate to modern men
the communication of much that is debatable and hard to communicate.
%
We are easily led astray by the renowned Greek clearness, transparency,
simplicity, and order, by their crystal-like naturalness and crystal-like
art, into believing that all these gifts were bestowed on the Greeks—for
instance, that they could not but write well, as Lichtenberg expressed
it on one occasion. Yet no statement could be more hasty and more
untenable. The history of prose from Gorgias to Demosthenes shows
a course of toiling and wrestling towards light from the obscure,
overloaded, and tasteless, reminding one of the labour of heroes who
had to construct the first roads through forest and bog. The dialogue of
tragedy was the real achievement of the dramatist, owing to its uncommon
clearness and precision, whereas the national tendency was to riot
in symbolism and innuendo, a tendency expressly fostered by the great
choral lyric. Similarly it was the achievement of Homer to liberate the
Greeks from Asiatic pomp and gloom, and to have attained the clearness
of architecture in details great and small. Nor was it by any means
thought easy to say anything in a pure and illuminating style. How else
should we account for the great admiration for the epigram of Simonides,
which shows itself so simple, with no gilded points or arabesques of
wit, but says all that it has to say plainly and with the calm of the
sun, not with the straining after effect of the lightning. Since the
struggle towards light from an almost native twilight is Greek, a thrill
of jubilation runs through the people when they hear a laconic sentence,
the language of elegy or the maxims of the Seven Wise Men. Hence they
were so fond of giving precepts in verse, a practice that we find
objectionable. This was the true Apolline task of the Hellenic spirit,
with the aim of rising superior to the perils of metre and the obscurity
which is otherwise characteristic of poetry. Simplicity, flexibility, and
sobriety were wrestled for and not given by nature to this people. The
danger of a relapse into Asianism constantly hovered over the Greeks,
and really overtook them from time to time like a murky, overflowing
tide of mystical impulses, primitive savagery and darkness. We see them
plunge in; we see Europe, as it were, flooded, washed away—for Europe
was very small then; but they always emerge once more to the light, good
swimmers and divers that they are, those fellow-countrymen of Odysseus.
%
Perhaps there is nothing more astonishing to the observer of the Greek
world than to discover that the Greeks from time to time held festivals,
as it were, for all their passions and evil tendencies alike, and in
fact even established a kind of series of festivals, by order of the
State, for their “all-too-human.” This is the pagan characteristic
of their world, which Christianity has never understood and never
can understand, and has always combated and despised.—They accepted
this all-too-human as unavoidable, and preferred, instead of railing
at it, to give it a kind of secondary right by grafting it on to the
usages of society and religion. All in man that has power they called
divine, and wrote it on the walls of their heaven. They do not deny
this natural instinct that expresses itself in evil characteristics,
but regulate and limit it to definite cults and days, so as to turn
those turbulent streams into as harmless a course as possible, after
devising sufficient precautionary measures. That is the root of all
the moral broad-mindedness of antiquity. To the wicked, the dubious,
the backward, the animal element, as to the barbaric, pre-Hellenic and
Asiatic, which still lived in the depths of Greek nature, they allowed
a moderate outflow, and did not strive to destroy it utterly. The whole
system was under the domain of the State, which was built up not on
individuals or castes, but on common human qualities. In the structure of
the State the Greeks show that wonderful sense for typical facts which
later on enabled them to become investigators of Nature, historians,
geographers, and philosophers. It was not a limited moral law of priests
or castes, which had to decide about the constitution of the State and
State worship, but the most comprehensive view of the reality of all
that is human. Whence do the Greeks derive this freedom, this sense of
reality? Perhaps from Homer and the poets who preceded him. For just
those poets whose nature is generally not the most wise or just possess,
in compensation, that delight in reality and activity of every kind, and
prefer not to deny even evil.  It suffices for them if evil moderates
itself, does not kill or inwardly poison everything—in other words,
they have similar ideas to those of the founders of Greek constitutions,
and were their teachers and forerunners.
%
In Greece, deep, thorough, serious minds were the exception. The national
instinct tended rather to regard the serious and thorough as a kind of
grimace. To borrow forms from a foreign source, not to create but to
transform into the fairest shapes—that is Greek. To imitate, not for
utility but for artistic illusion, ever and anon to gain the mastery over
forced seriousness, to arrange, beautify, simplify—that is the continual
task from Homer to the Sophists of the third and fourth centuries of our
era, who are all outward show, pompous speech, declamatory gestures, and
address themselves to shallow souls that care only for appearance, sound,
and effect. And now let us estimate the greatness of those exceptional
Greeks, who created science! Whoever tells of them, tells the most heroic
story of the human mind!
%
In the history of religious ideas many errors about development and false
gradations are made in matters which in reality are not consecutive
outgrowths but contemporary yet separate phenomena. In particular,
simplicity has still far too much the reputation of being the oldest,
the initial thing. Much that is human arises by subtraction and division,
and not merely by doubling, addition, and unification.—For instance,
men still believe in a gradual development of the idea of God from
those unwieldy stones and blocks of wood up to the highest forms of
anthropomorphism. Yet the fact is that so long as divinity was attributed
to and felt in trees, logs of wood, stones, and beasts, people shrank
from humanising their forms as from an act of godlessness. First of all,
poets, apart from all considerations of cult and the ban of religious
shame, have had to make the inner imagination of man accustomed and
compliant to this notion.  Wherever more pious periods and phases of
thought gained the upper hand, this liberating influence of poets fell
into the background, and sanctity remained, after as before, on the
side of the monstrous, uncanny, quite peculiarly inhuman. And then,
much of what the inner imagination ventures to picture to itself would
exert a painful influence if externally and corporeally represented. The
inner eye is far bolder and more shameless than the outer (whence the
well-known difficulty and, to some extent, impossibility, of working epic
material into dramatic form). The religious imagination for a long time
entirely refuses to believe in the identity of God with an image: the
image is meant to fix the _numen_ of the Deity, actually and specifically,
although in a mysterious and not altogether intelligible way. The oldest
image of the Gods is meant to shelter and at the same time to hide(14)
the God—to indicate him but not to expose him to view. No Greek really
looked upon his Apollo as a pointed pillar of wood, his Eros as a lump of
stone. These were symbols, which were intended to inspire dread of the
manifestation of the God. It was the same with those blocks of wood out
of which individual limbs, generally in excessive number, were fashioned
with the scantiest of carving—as, for instance, a Laconian Apollo with
four hands and four ears. In the incomplete, symbolical, or excessive
lies a terrible sanctity, which is meant to prevent us from thinking of
anything human or similar to humanity. It is not an embryonic stage of
art in which such things are made—as if they were not _able_ to speak
more plainly and portray more sensibly in the age when such images were
honoured! Rather, men are afraid of just one thing—direct speaking
out. Just as the cella hides and conceals in a mysterious twilight,
yet not completely, the holy of holies, the real _numen_ of the Deity;
just as, again, the peripteric temple hides the cella, protecting it from
indiscreet eyes as with a screen and a veil, yet not completely—so it
is with the image of the Deity, and at the same time the concealment of
the Deity.—Only when outside the cult, in the profane world of athletic
contest, the joy in the victor had risen so high that the ripples thus
started reacted upon the lake of religious emotion, was the statue of the
victor set up before the temple. Then the pious pilgrim had to accustom
his eye and his soul, whether he would or no, to the inevitable sight
of human beauty and super-strength, so that the worship of men and Gods
melted into each other from physical and spiritual contact. Then too for
the first time the fear of really humanising the figures of the Gods is
lost, and the mighty arena for great plastic art is opened—even now
with the limitation that wherever there is to be adoration the primitive
form and ugliness are carefully preserved and copied. But the Hellene,
as he dedicates and makes offerings, may now with religious sanction
indulge in his delight in making God become a man.
%
Immediate self-observation is not enough, by a long way, to enable us to
learn to know ourselves. We need history, for the past continues to flow
through us in a hundred channels. We ourselves are, after all, nothing
but our own sensation at every moment of this continued flow. Even here,
when we wish to step down into the stream of our apparently most peculiar
and personal development, Heraclitus’ aphorism, “You cannot step
twice into the same river,” holds good.—This is a piece of wisdom
which has, indeed, gradually become trite, but nevertheless has remained
as strong and true as it ever was. It is the same with the saying that,
in order to understand history, we must scrutinise the living remains of
historical periods; that we must travel, as old Herodotus travelled, to
other nations, especially to those so-called savage or half-savage races
in regions where man has doffed or not yet donned European garb. For
they are ancient and firmly established steps of culture on which we
can stand. There is, however, a more subtle art and aim in travelling,
which does not always necessitate our passing from place to place and
going thousands of miles away. Very probably the last three centuries,
in all their colourings and refractions of culture, survive even in our
vicinity, only they have to be discovered. In some families, or even in
individuals, the strata are still superimposed on each other, beautifully
and perceptibly; in other places there are dispersions and displacements
of the structure which are harder to understand. Certainly in remote
districts, in less known mountain valleys, circumscribed communities
have been able more easily to maintain an admirable pattern of a far
older sentiment, a pattern that must here be investigated. On the other
hand, it is improbable that such discoveries will be made in Berlin,
where man comes into the world washed-out and sapless. He who after
long practice of this art of travel has become a hundred-eyed Argus
will accompany his Io—I mean his ego—everywhere, and in Egypt and
Greece, Byzantium and Rome, France and Germany, in the age of wandering or
settled races, in Renaissance or Reformation, at home and abroad, in sea,
forest, plant, and mountain, will again light upon the travel-adventure
of this ever-growing, ever-altered ego.—Thus self-knowledge becomes
universal knowledge as regards the entire past, and, by another chain
of observation, which can only be indicated here, self-direction and
self-training in the freest and most far-seeing spirits might become
universal direction as regards all future humanity.
%
We cannot ponder too deeply on this fact: Christianity is the religion
of antiquity grown old; it presupposes degenerate old culture-stocks,
and on them it had, and still has, power to work like balm. There
are periods when ears and eyes are full of slime, so that they can
no longer hear the voice of reason and philosophy or see the wisdom
that walks in bodily shape, whether it bears the name of Epictetus
or of Epicurus. Then, perhaps, the erection of the martyr’s cross
and the “trumpet of the last judgment” may have the effect of
still inspiring such races to end their lives decently. If we think
of Juvenal’s Rome, of that poisonous toad with the eyes of Venus,
we understand what it means to make the sign of the Cross before the
world, we honour the silent Christian community and are grateful for
its having stifled the Greco-Roman Empire.  If, indeed, most men were
then born in spiritual slavery, with the sensuality of old men, what a
pleasure to meet beings who were more soul than body, and who seemed to
realise the Greek idea of the shades of the under-world—shy, scurrying,
chirping, kindly creatures, with a reversion on the “better life,” and
therefore so unassuming, so secretly scornful, so proudly patient!—This
Christianity, as the evening chime of the _good_ antiquity, with cracked,
weary and yet melodious bell, is balm in the ears even to one who only
now traverses those centuries historically. What must it have been to
those men themselves!—To young and fresh barbarian nations, on the
other hand, Christianity is a poison. For to implant the teaching of
sinfulness and damnation in the heroic, childlike, and animal soul
of the old Germans is nothing but poisoning. An enormous chemical
fermentation and decomposition, a medley of sentiments and judgments, a
rank growth of adventurous legend, and hence in the long run a fundamental
weakening of such barbarian peoples, was the inevitable result. True,
without this weakening what should we have left of Greek culture, of the
whole cultured past of the human race? For the barbarians untouched by
Christianity knew very well how to make a clean sweep of old cultures, as
was only too clearly shown by the heathen conquerors of Romanised Britain.
Thus Christianity, against its will, was compelled to aid in making “the
antique world” immortal.—There remains, however, a counter-question
and the possibility of a counter-reckoning. Without this weakening through
the poisoning referred to, would any of those fresh stocks—the Germans,
for instance—have been in a position gradually to find by themselves a
higher, a peculiar, a new culture, of which the most distant conception
would therefore have been lost to humanity?—In this, as in every case,
we do not know, Christianly speaking, whether God owes the devil or the
devil God more thanks for everything having turned out as it has.
%
A Christian who happened upon forbidden paths of thought might well
ask himself on some occasion whether it is really necessary that there
should be a God, side by side with a representative Lamb, if faith in
the existence of these beings suffices to produce the same influences? If
they do exist after all, are they not superfluous beings? For all that is
given by the Christian religion to the human soul, all that is beneficent,
consoling, and edifying, just as much as all that depresses and crushes,
emanates from that faith and not from the objects of that faith. It is
here as in another well-known case—there were indeed no witches, but the
terrible effects of the belief in witches were the same as if they really
had existed. For all occasions where the Christian awaits the immediate
intervention of a God, though in vain (for there is no God), his religion
is inventive enough to find subterfuges and reasons for tranquillity. In
so far Christianity is an ingenious religion.—Faith, indeed, has up to
the present not been able to move real mountains, although I do not know
who assumed that it could. But it can put mountains where there are none.
%
Here and there we see with terrible clearness the harlequinade of Fortune,
how she fastens the rope, on which she wills that succeeding centuries
should dance, on to a few days, one place, the condition and opinions
of one brain. Thus the fate of modern German history lies in the days of
that disputation at Regensburg: the peaceful settlement of ecclesiastical
and moral affairs, without religious wars or a counter-reformation, and
also the unity of the German nation, seemed assured: the deep, gentle
spirit of Contarini hovered for one moment over the theological squabble,
victorious, as representative of the riper Italian piety, reflecting
the morning glory of intellectual freedom.  But Luther’s hard head,
full of suspicions and strange misgivings, showed resistance. Because
justification by grace appeared to him _his_ greatest motto and discovery,
he did not believe the phrase in the mouth of Italians; whereas, in point
of fact, as is well known, they had invented it much earlier and spread
it throughout Italy in deep silence. In this apparent agreement Luther
saw the tricks of the devil, and hindered the work of peace as well as
he could, thereby advancing to a great extent the aims of the Empire’s
foes.—And now, in order to have a still stronger idea of the dreadful
farcicality of it all, let us add that none of the principles about
which men then disputed in Regensburg—neither that of original sin,
nor that of redemption by proxy, nor that of justification by faith—is
in any way true or even has any connection with truth: that they are now
all recognised as incapable of being discussed. Yet on this account the
world was set on fire—that is to say, by opinions which correspond
to no things or realities; whereas as regards purely philological
questions—as, for instance, that of the sacramental words in the
Eucharist—discussion at any rate is permitted, because in this case
the truth can be said. But “where nothing is, even truth has lost her
right.”(15)—Lastly, it only remains to be said that it is true these
principles give rise to sources of power so mighty that without them all
the mills of the modern world could not be driven with such force. And
it is primarily a matter of force, only secondarily of truth (and perhaps
not even secondarily)—is it not so, my dear up-to-date friends?
%
Goethe is a signal exception among great artists in that he did not live
within the limited confines of his real capacity, as if that must be
the essential, the distinctive, the unconditional, and the last thing
in him and for all the world. Twice he intended to possess something
higher than he really possessed—and went astray in the second half
of his life, where he seems quite convinced that he is one of the great
scientific discoverers and illuminators. So too in the first half of his
life he demanded of himself something higher than the poetic art seemed
to him—and here already he made a mistake. That nature wished to make
him a plastic artist,—_this_ was his inwardly glowing and scorching
secret, which finally drove him to Italy, that he might give vent to
his mania in this direction and make to it every possible sacrifice. At
last, shrewd as he was, and honestly averse to any mental perversion
in himself, he discovered that a tricksy elf of desire had attracted
him to the belief in this calling, and that he must free himself of the
greatest passion of his heart and bid it farewell. The painful conviction,
tearing and gnawing at his vitals, that it was necessary to bid farewell,
finds full expression in the character of Tasso. Over Tasso, that Werther
intensified, hovers the premonition of something worse than death, as
when one says: “Now it is over, after this farewell: how shall I go on
living without going mad?” These two fundamental errors of his life gave
Goethe, in face of a purely literary attitude towards poetry (the only
attitude then known to the world), such an unembarrassed and apparently
almost arbitrary position. Not to speak of the period when Schiller
(poor Schiller, who had no time himself and left no time to others)
drove away his shy dread of poetry, his fear of all literary life and
craftsmanship, Goethe appears like a Greek who now and then visits his
beloved, doubting whether she be not a Goddess to whom he can give no
proper name. In all his poetry one notices the inspiring neighbourhood
of plastic art and Nature. The features of these figures that floated
before him—and perhaps he always thought he was on the track of the
metamorphoses of one Goddess—became, without his will or knowledge,
the features of all the children of his art. Without the extravagances
of error he would not have been Goethe—that is, the only German artist
in writing who has not yet become out of date—just because he desired
as little to be a writer as a German by vocation.
%
Among travellers we may distinguish five grades. The first and lowest
grade is of those who travel and are seen—they become really travelled
and are, as it were, blind. Next come those who really see the world. The
third class experience the results of their seeing. The fourth weave their
experience into their life and carry it with them henceforth. Lastly,
there are some men of the highest strength who, as soon as they have
returned home, must finally and necessarily work out in their lives
and productions all the things seen that they have experienced and
incorporated in themselves.—Like these five species of travellers,
all mankind goes through the whole pilgrimage of life, the lowest as
purely passive, the highest as those who act and live out their lives
without keeping back any residue of inner experiences.
%
So soon as we climb higher than those who hitherto admired us, we
appear to them as sunken and fallen. For they imagined that under all
circumstances they were on the heights in our company (maybe also through
our agency).
%
Of two quite lofty things, measure and moderation, it is best never
to speak. A few know their force and significance, from the mysterious
paths of inner experiences and conversions: they honour in them something
quite godlike, and are afraid to speak aloud. All the rest hardly listen
when they are spoken about, and think the subjects under discussion are
tedium and mediocrity. We must perhaps except those who have once heard
a warning note from that realm but have stopped their ears against the
sound. The recollection of it makes them angry and exasperated.
%
“If thou wilt take the left hand, then I will go to the right,”(16)
that feeling is the hall-mark of humanity in intimate intercourse,
and without that feeling every friendship, every band of apostles or
disciples, sooner or later becomes a fraud.
%
Men of profound thought appear to themselves in intercourse with others
like comedians, for in order to be understood they must always simulate
superficiality.
%
He who regards human beings as a herd, and flies from them as fast as
he can, will certainly be caught up by them and gored upon their horns.
%
In society, he who gives another an opportunity of favourably setting
forth his knowledge, sentiments, and experience sets himself above
him. Unless he is felt by the other to be a superior being without
limitation, he is guilty of an attack upon his vanity, while what he
aimed at was the gratification of the other man’s vanity.
%
When a long life of action distinguished by speeches and writings gives
publicity to a man’s personality, personal intercourse with him is
generally disappointing on two grounds. Firstly, one expects too much
from a brief period of intercourse (namely, all that the thousand and
one opportunities of life can alone bring out). Secondly, no recognised
person gives himself the trouble to woo recognition in individual cases.
He is too careless, and we are at too high a tension.
%
To treat all men with equal good-humour, and to be kind without
distinction of persons, may arise as much from a profound contempt for
mankind as from an ingrained love of humanity.
%
There are certain signs that you have gone farther and higher. There is a
freer, wider prospect before you, the air blows cooler yet milder in your
face (you have unlearned the folly of confounding mildness with warmth),
your gait is more firm and vigorous, courage and discretion have waxed
together. On all these grounds your journey may now be more lonely and
in any case more perilous than heretofore, if indeed not to the extent
believed by those who from the misty valley see you, the roamer, striding
on the mountains.
%
I admit that my head is set wrong on my neck only, for every other man,
as is well known, knows better than I what I should do or leave alone. The
only one who cannot help me is myself, poor beggar! Are we not all like
statues on which false heads have been placed? Eh, dear neighbour?—Ah
no; you, just you, are the exception!
%
We must either not go about at all with people who are lacking in the
reverence for personalities, or inexorably fetter them beforehand with
the manacles of convention.
%
In conversation with strangers or little-known acquaintances, to express
only selected thoughts, to speak of one’s famous acquaintances, and
important experiences and travels, is a sign that one is not proud, or at
least would not like to appear proud. Vanity is the polite mask of pride.
%
A good friendship arises when the one man deeply respects the other,
more even than himself; loves him also, though not so much as himself;
and finally, to facilitate intercourse, knows how to add the delicate
bloom and veneer of intimacy, but at the same time wisely refrains from
a true, real intimacy, from the confounding of _meum_ and _tuum_.
%
If we change ourselves vitally, our friends, who have not changed, become
ghosts of our own past: their voice sounds shadowy and dreadful to us,
as if we heard our own voice speaking, but younger, harder, less mellow.
%
The same people whose eyes naturally plead for favours and indulgences
are accustomed, from their frequent humiliations and cravings for revenge,
to assume a shameless glance as well.
%
A child throughout life—that sounds very touching, but is only the
verdict from the distance. Seen and known close at hand, he is always
called “puerile throughout life.”
%
The mute perplexity of the subtle brain is usually understood by the
non-subtle as a silent superiority, and is much dreaded whereas the
perception of perplexity would produce good will.
%
The philanthropy of the sage sometimes makes him decide to pretend to be
excited, enraged, or delighted, so that he may not hurt his surroundings
by the coldness and rationality of his true nature.
%
So soon as we note that any one in intercourse and conversation with
us has to force himself to attention, we have adequate evidence that he
loves us not, or loves us no longer.
%
Learning from one’s enemies is the best way to love them, for it
inspires us with a grateful mood towards them.
%
The importunate man gives us gold coins as change for our convention
coins, and thereby tries to force us afterwards to treat our convention
as an oversight and him as an exception.
%
We become hostile to many an artist or writer, not because we notice in
the end that he has duped us, but because he did not find more subtle
means necessary to entrap us.
%
Not by the way one soul approaches another, but by the way it separates,
do I recognise its relationship and homogeneity with the other.
%
We must not speak about our friends, or we renounce the sentiment of
friendship.
%
Impoliteness is often the sign of a clumsy modesty, which when taken by
surprise loses its head and would fain hide the fact by means of rudeness.
%
Our newest acquaintances are sometimes the first to learn what we
have hitherto kept dark. We have the foolish notion that our proof of
confidence is the strongest fetter wherewith to hold them fast. But _they_
do not know enough about us to feel so strongly the sacrifice involved
in our speaking out, and betray our secrets to others without any idea
of betrayal. Hereby we possibly lose our old friends.
%
All men whom we let stand long in the ante-chamber of our favour get
into a state of fermentation or become bitter.
%
When we have sunk unmistakably in the estimation of mankind we should
cling tooth and nail to modesty in intercourse, or we shall betray to
others that we have sunk in our own estimation as well.  Cynicism in
intercourse is a sign that a man, when alone, treats himself too as a dog.
%
With regard to the respect of those who pay respect, it is an advantage
ostensibly not to understand certain things.  Ignorance, too, confers
privileges.
%
The impatient and arrogant man does not care for grace, feeling it to
be a corporeal, visible reproach against himself. For grace is heartfelt
toleration in movement and gesture.
%
When old friends see each other again after a long separation, it often
happens that they affect an interest in matters to which they have long
since become indifferent. Sometimes both remark this, but dare not raise
the veil—from a mournful doubt. Hence arise conversations as in the
realm of the dead.
%
The man of leisure is dangerous to his friends, for, having nothing to
do, he talks of what his friends are doing or not doing, interferes,
and finally makes himself a nuisance.  The clever man will only make
friends with the industrious.
%
It is an unequal combat when one man defends his cause with head and
heart, the other with head alone. The first has sun and wind against
him, as it were, and his two weapons interfere with each other: he loses
the prize—in the eyes of truth. True, the victory of the second, with
his one weapon, is seldom a victory after the hearts of all the other
spectators, and makes him unpopular.
%
The public easily confounds him who fishes in troubled waters with him
who pumps up from the depths.
%
Many a man, from vanity, maltreats even his friends, when in the presence
of witnesses to whom he wishes to make his own preponderance clear. Others
exaggerate the merits of their enemies, in order to point proudly to
the fact that they are worthy of such foes.
%
The over-heating of the heart is generally allied with illness of the
head and judgment. He who is concerned for a time with the health of
his head must know what he has to cool, careless of the future of his
heart. For if we are capable at all of giving warmth, we are sure to
become warm again and then have our summer.
%
Towards science women and self-seeking artists entertain a feeling that
is composed of envy and sentimentality.
%
We seldom break our leg so long as life continues a toilsome upward
climb. The danger comes when we begin to take things easily and choose
the convenient paths.
%
We must beware of becoming sharp too early, or we shall also become thin
too early.
%
The good teacher knows cases where he is proud that his pupil remains
true to himself in opposition to him—at times when the youth must not
understand the man or would be harmed by understanding him.
%
Young men, who wish to be more honest than they have been, seek as
victim some one acknowledged to be honest, attacking him first with an
attempt to reach his height by abuse—with the underlying notion that
this first experiment at any rate is void of danger. For just such a
one has no right to chastise the impudence of the honest man.
%
We think, short-sighted that we are, that fairy-tales and games belong to
childhood. As if at any age we should care to live without fairy-tales and
games! Our words and sentiments are indeed different, but the essential
fact remains the same, as is proved by the child himself looking on games
as his work and fairy-tales as his truth.  The shortness of life ought to
preserve us from a pedantic distinction between the different ages—as
if every age brought something new—and a poet ought one day to portray
a man of two hundred, who really lives without fairy-tales and games.
%
The period of life in which a philosopher finds his teaching is manifested
by his teaching; he cannot avoid that, however elevated above time and
hour he may feel himself. Thus, Schopenhauer’s philosophy remains a
mirror of his hot and melancholy youth—it is no mode of thought for
older men. Plato’s philosophy reminds one of the middle thirties,
when a warm and a cold current generally rush together, so that spray
and delicate clouds and, under favourable circumstances and glimpses of
sunshine, enchanting rainbow-pictures result.
%
The intellectual strength of a woman is best proved by the fact that
she offers her own intellect as a sacrifice out of love for a man
and his intellect, and that nevertheless in the new domain, which was
previously foreign to her nature, a second intellect at once arises as
an aftergrowth, to which the man’s mind impels her.
%
The storm of desire will sometimes carry a man up to a height where all
desire is silenced, where he really loves and lives in a better state
of being rather than in a better state of choice. On the other hand,
a good woman, from true love, often climbs down to desire, and lowers
herself in her own eyes. The latter action in particular is one of the
most pathetic sensations which the idea of a good marriage can involve.
%
By woman Nature shows how far she has hitherto achieved her task of
fashioning humanity, by man she shows what she has had to overcome and
what she still proposes to do for humanity.—The most perfect woman
of every age is the holiday-task of the Creator on every seventh day of
culture, the recreation of the artist from his work.
%
If we have spent our intellect in order to gain mastery over the
intemperance of the passions, the sad result often follows that we
transfer the intemperance to the intellect, and from that time forth
are extravagant in thought and desire of knowledge.
%
How and when a woman laughs is a sign of her culture, but in the ring of
laughter her nature reveals itself, and in highly cultured women perhaps
even the last insoluble residue of their nature. Hence the psychologist
will say with Horace, though from different reasons: “Ridete puellae.”
%
Youths varyingly show devotion and impudence towards the same person,
because at bottom they only despise or admire themselves in that other
person, and between the two feelings but stagger to and fro in themselves,
so long as they have not found in experience the measure of their will
and ability.
%
If we forbade the discontented, the sullen, and the atrabilious to
propagate, we might transform the world into a garden of happiness.—This
aphorism belongs to a practical philosophy for the female sex.
%
The feminine phrase “Do not distrust your emotions” does not mean much
more than “Eat what tastes good to you.” This may also, especially
for moderate natures, be a good everyday rule. But other natures must
live according to another maxim: “You must eat not only with your
mouth but also with your brain, in order that the greediness of your
mouth may not prove your undoing.”
%
Every great love involves the cruel thought of killing the object of
love, so that it may be removed once for all from the mischievous play
of change. For love is more afraid of change than of destruction.
%
In everything that is learnt or experienced, the child, just like the
man, sees doors; but for the former they are places to go _to_, for the
latter to go _through_.
%
The sympathy of women, which is talkative, takes the sick-bed to market.
%
He who acquires merit early in life tends to forget all reverence for age
and old people, and accordingly, greatly to his disadvantage, excludes
himself from the society of the mature, those who confer maturity. Thus
in spite of his early merit he remains green, importunate, and boyish
longer than others.
%
Women and artists think that where we do not contradict them we
cannot. Reverence on ten counts and silent disapproval on ten others
appears to them an impossible combination, because their souls are all
of a piece.
%
With respect to young talents we must strictly follow Goethe’s maxim,
that we should often avoid harming error in order to avoid harming
truth. Their condition is like the diseases of pregnancy, and involves
strange appetites. These appetites should be satisfied and humoured
as far as possible, for the sake of the fruit they may be expected to
produce. It is true that, as nurse of these remarkable invalids, one
must learn the difficult art of voluntary self-abasement.
%
Women are so constituted that all truth (in relation to men, love,
children, society, aim of life) disgusts them—and that they try to be
revenged on every one who opens their eyes.
%
Whence arises the sudden passion of a man for a woman, a passion so
deep, so vital? Least of all from sensuality only: but when a man finds
weakness, need of help, and high spirits united in the same creature,
he suffers a sort of overflowing of soul, and is touched and offended
at the same moment. At this point arises the source of great love.
%
In the child, the sense for cleanliness should be fanned into a passion,
and then later on he will raise himself, in ever new phases, to almost
every virtue, and will finally appear, in compensation for all talent,
as a shining cloud of purity, temperance, gentleness, and character,
happy in himself and spreading happiness around.
%
Profundity of thought belongs to youth, clarity of thought to old
age. When, in spite of this, old men sometimes speak and write in
the manner of the profound, they do so from vanity, imagining that
they thereby assume the charm of juvenility, enthusiasm, growth,
apprehensiveness, hopefulness.
%
Men use a new lesson or experience later on as a ploughshare or perhaps
also as a weapon, women at once make it into an ornament.
%
If it is conceded to a woman that she is right, she cannot deny herself
the triumph of setting her heel on the neck of the vanquished; she must
taste her victory to the full. On the other hand, man towards man in such
a case is ashamed of being right. But then man is accustomed to victory;
with woman it is an exception.
%
In order to become beautiful, a woman must not desire to be considered
pretty. That is to say, in ninety-nine out of a hundred cases where she
could please she must scorn and put aside all thoughts of pleasing. Only
then can she ever reap the delight of him whose soul’s portal is wide
enough to admit the great.
%
A youth cannot understand that an old man has also had his delights,
his dawns of feeling, his changings and soarings of thought. It offends
him to think that such things have existed before. But it makes him
very bitter to hear that, to become fruitful, he must lose those buds
and dispense with their fragrance.
%
Every party that can assume an air of martyrdom wins good-natured
souls over to its side and thereby itself acquires an air of good
nature—greatly to its advantage.
%
An assertion has, with the majority of men at any rate, more effect than
an argument, for arguments provoke mistrust. Hence demagogues seek to
strengthen the arguments of their party by assertions.
%
All regularly successful men are profoundly cunning in making their
faults and weaknesses look like manifestations of strength. This proves
that they must know their defects uncommonly well.
%
He sat in the city gateway and said to one who passed through that this
was the city gate. The latter replied that this was true, but that one
must not be too much in the right if one expected to be thanked for
it. “Oh,” answered the other, “I don’t want thanks, but from
time to time it is very pleasant not merely to be in the right but to
remain in the right.”
%
Goethe’s nobleness and freedom from envy, Beethoven’s fine hermitical
resignation, Mozart’s cheerfulness and grace of heart, Handel’s
unbending manliness and freedom under the law, Bach’s confident and
luminous inner life, such as does not even need to renounce glamour
and success—are these qualities peculiarly German?—If they are not,
they at least prove to what goal Germans should strive and to what they
can attain.
%
_PIA FRAUS_ OR SOMETHING ELSE.—I hope I am mistaken, but I think that
in Germany of to-day a twofold sort of hypocrisy is set up as the duty of
the moment for every one. From imperial-political misgivings Germanism
is demanded, and from social apprehensions Christianity—but both only
in words and gestures, and particularly in ability to keep silent. It
is the veneer that nowadays costs so much and is paid for so highly;
and for the benefit of the spectators the face of the nation assumes
German and Christian wrinkles.
%
In all things that are constructed to last and demand the service of many
hands, much that is less good must be made a rule, although the organiser
knows what is better and harder very well. He will calculate that there
will never be a lack of persons who _can_ correspond to the rule, and he
knows that the middling good is the rule.—The youth seldom sees this
point, and as an innovator thinks how marvellously he is in the right
and how strange is the blindness of others.
%
The true partisan learns nothing more, he only experiences and judges. It
is significant that Solon, who was never a partisan but pursued his aims
above and apart from parties or even against them, was the father of
that simple phrase wherein lies the secret of the health and vitality
of Athens: “I grow old, but I am always learning.”
%
They are really intolerable people of whom one cannot even accept the
good, who have freedom of disposition but do not remark that they are
lacking in freedom of taste and spirit. Yet just this, according to
Goethe’s well-weighed judgment, is German.—His voice and his example
indicate that the German should be more than a German if he wishes to
be useful or even endurable to other nations—and which direction his
striving should take, in order that he may rise above and beyond himself.
%
When the masses begin to rage, and reason is under a cloud, it is a good
thing, if the health of one’s soul is not quite assured, to go under
a doorway and look out to see what the weather is like.
%
The only remedy against Socialism that still lies in your power is to
avoid provoking Socialism—in other words, to live in moderation and
contentment, to prevent as far as possible all lavish display, and to
aid the State as far as possible in its taxing of all superfluities
and luxuries. You do not like this remedy?  Then, you rich bourgeois
who call yourselves “Liberals,” confess that it is your own
inclination that you find so terrible and menacing in Socialists,
but allow to prevail in yourselves as unavoidable, as if with you it
were something different. As you are constituted, if you had not your
fortune and the cares of maintaining it, this bent of yours would make
Socialists of you. Possession alone differentiates you from them. If
you wish to conquer the assailants of your prosperity, you must first
conquer yourselves.—And if that prosperity only meant well-being,
it would not be so external and provocative of envy; it would be more
generous, more benevolent, more compensatory, more helpful. But the
spurious, histrionic element in your pleasures, which lie more in the
feeling of contrast (because others have them not, and feel envious)
than in feelings of realised and heightened power—your houses,
dresses, carriages, shops, the demands of your palates and your tables,
your noisy operatic and musical enthusiasm; lastly your women, formed
and fashioned but of base metal, gilded but without the ring of gold,
chosen by you for show and considering themselves meant for show—these
are the things that spread the poison of that national disease, which
seizes the masses ever more and more as a Socialistic heart-itch, but has
its origin and breeding-place in you. Who shall now arrest this epidemic?
%
When a party observes that a previous member has changed from an
unqualified to a qualified adherent, it endures it so ill that it
irritates and mortifies him in every possible way with the object of
forcing him to a decisive break and making him an opponent. For the
party suspects that the intention of finding a relative value in its
faith, a value which admits of pro and con, of weighing and discarding,
is more dangerous than downright opposition.
%
Whoever wishes to strengthen a party internally should give it an
opportunity of being forcibly treated with obvious injustice. The party
thus acquires a capital of good conscience, which hitherto it perhaps
lacked.
%
As men after all only respect the old-established and slowly developed,
he who would survive after his death must not only provide for posterity
but still more for the past. Hence tyrants of every sort (including
tyrannical artists and politicians) like to do violence to history,
so that history may seem a preparation and a ladder up to them.
%
The beating of drums, which delights young writers who serve a party,
sounds to him who does not belong to the party like a rattling of chains,
and excites sympathy rather than admiration.
%
Our followers never forgive us for taking sides against ourselves,
for we seem in their eyes not only to be spurning their love but to be
exposing them to the charge of lack of intelligence.
%
Only a man of intellect should hold property: otherwise property is
dangerous to the community. For the owner, not knowing how to make use
of the leisure which his possessions might secure to him, will continue
to strive after more property. This strife will be his occupation, his
strategy in the war with ennui. So in the end real wealth is produced from
the moderate property that would be enough for an intellectual man. Such
wealth, then, is the glittering outcrop of intellectual dependence
and poverty, but it looks quite different from what its humble origin
might lead one to expect, because it can mask itself with culture and
art—it can, in fact, purchase the mask. Hence it excites envy in the
poor and uncultured—who at bottom always envy culture and see no mask
in the mask—and gradually paves the way for a social revolution. For a
gilded coarseness and a histrionic blowing of trumpets in the pretended
enjoyment of culture inspires that class with the thought, “It is only
a matter of money,” whereas it is indeed to some extent a matter of
money, but far more of intellect.
%
Commanding is a joy, like obeying; the former when it has not yet become
a habit, the latter just when it has become a habit. Old servants under
new masters advance each other mutually in giving pleasure.
%
There is an ambition for a forlorn hope which forces a party to place
itself at the post of extreme danger.
%
We shall not move the crowd to cry “Hosanna!” until we have ridden
into the city upon an ass.
%
Every party attempts to represent the important elements that have
sprung up outside it as unimportant, and if it does not succeed, it
attacks those elements the more bitterly, the more excellent they are.
%
Of him who abandons himself to the course of events, a smaller and
smaller residue is continually left. Great politicians may therefore
become quite empty men, although they were once full and rich.
%
The Socialistic movements are nowadays becoming more and more agreeable
rather than terrifying to the dynastic governments, because by these
movements they are provided with a right and a weapon for making
exceptional rules, and can thus attack their real bogies, democrats and
anti-dynasts.—Towards all that such governments professedly detest
they feel a secret cordiality and inclination. But they are compelled
to draw the veil over their soul.
%
Only up to a certain point does possession make men feel freer and
more independent; one step farther, and possession becomes lord, the
possessor a slave. The latter must sacrifice his time, his thoughts to
the former, and feels himself compelled to an intercourse, nailed to a
spot, incorporated with the State—perhaps quite in conflict with his
real and essential needs.
%
It is easy, ridiculously easy, to set up a model for the choice of
a legislative body. First of all the honest and reliable men of the
nation, who at the same time are masters and experts in some one branch,
have to become prominent by mutual scenting-out and recognition. From
these, by a narrower process of selection, the learned and expert of
the first rank in each individual branch must again be chosen, also by
mutual recognition and guarantee. If the legislative body be composed
of these, it will finally be necessary, in each individual case, that
only the voices and judgments of the most specialised experts should
decide; the honesty of all the rest should have become so great that
it is simply a matter of decency to leave the voting also in the hands
of these men. The result would be that the law, in the strictest sense,
would emanate from the intelligence of the most intelligent.—As things
now are, voting is done by parties, and at every division there must
be hundreds of uneasy consciences among the ill-taught, the incapable
of judgment, among those who merely repeat, imitate, and go with the
tide.  Nothing lowers the dignity of a new law so much as this inherent
shamefaced feeling of insincerity that necessarily results at every party
division. But, as has been said, it is easy, ridiculously easy, to set up
such a model: no power on earth is at present strong enough to realise
such an ideal—unless the belief in the highest utility of knowledge,
and of those that know, at last dawns even upon the most hostile minds
and is preferred to the prevalent belief in majorities. In the sense of
such a future may our watchword be: “More reverence for them that know,
and down with all parties!”
%
The vague, vacillating, premonitory, elementary, intuitive elements—to
choose obscure names for obscure things—that are attributed to the
German nature would be, if they really still existed, a proof that our
culture has remained several stages behind and is still surrounded by
the spell and atmosphere of the Middle Ages.—It is true that in this
backwardness there are certain advantages: by these qualities the Germans
(if, as has been said before, they still possess them) would possess the
capacity, which other nations have now lost, for doing certain things
and particularly for understanding certain things. Much undoubtedly is
lost if the lack of sense—which is just the common factor in all those
qualities—is lost. Here too, however, there are no losses without the
highest compensatory gains, so that no reason is left for lamenting,
granting that we do not, like children, and gourmands, wish to enjoy at
once the fruits of all seasons of the year.
%
The governments of the great States have two instruments for keeping
the people dependent, in fear and obedience: a coarser, the army, and a
more refined, the school. With the aid of the former they win over to
their side the ambition of the higher strata and the strength of the
lower, so far as both are characteristic of active and energetic men
of moderate or inferior gifts. With the aid of the latter they win over
gifted poverty, especially the intellectually pretentious semi-poverty
of the middle classes. Above all, they make teachers of all grades into
an intellectual court looking unconsciously “towards the heights.”
By putting obstacle after obstacle in the way of private schools and
the wholly distasteful individual tuition they secure the disposal of a
considerable number of educational posts, towards which numerous hungry
and submissive eyes are turned to an extent five times as great as can
ever be satisfied. These posts, however, must support the holder but
meagrely, so that he maintains a feverish thirst for promotion and becomes
still more closely attached to the views of the government. For it is
always more advantageous to foster moderate discontent than contentment,
the mother of courage, the grandmother of free thought and exuberance. By
means of this physically and mentally bridled body of teachers, the youth
of the country is as far as possible raised to a certain level of culture
that is useful to the State and arranged on a suitable sliding-scale.
Above all, the immature and ambitious minds of all classes are almost
imperceptibly imbued with the idea that only a career which is recognised
and hall-marked by the State can lead immediately to social distinction.
The effect of this belief in government examinations and titles goes so
far that even men who have remained independent and have risen by trade
or handicraft still feel a pang of discontent in their hearts until their
position too is marked and acknowledged by a gracious bestowal of rank
and orders from above—until one becomes a “somebody.” Finally the
State connects all these hundreds of offices and posts in its hands with
the obligation of being trained and hallmarked in these State schools if
one ever wishes to enter this charmed circle. Honour in society, daily
bread, the possibility of a family, protection from above, the feeling of
community in a common culture—all this forms a network of hopes into
which every young man walks: how should he feel the slightest breath of
mistrust? In the end, perhaps, the obligation of being a soldier for one
year has become with every one, after the lapse of a few generations,
an unreflecting habit, an understood thing, with an eye to which we
construct the plan of our lives quite early. Then the State can venture on
the master-stroke of weaving together school and army, talent, ambition
and strength by means of common advantages—that is, by attracting the
more highly gifted on favourable terms to the army and inspiring them
with the military spirit of joyful obedience; so that finally, perhaps,
they become attached permanently to the flag and endow it by their talents
with an ever new and more brilliant lustre. Then nothing more is wanted
but an opportunity for great wars. These are provided from professional
reasons (and so in all innocence) by diplomats, aided by newspapers
and Stock Exchanges. For “the nation,” as a nation of soldiers,
need never be supplied with a good conscience in war—it has one already.
%
If we consider how even to-day all great political transactions glide upon
the stage secretly and stealthily; how they are hidden by unimportant
events, and seem small when close at hand; how they only show their
far-reaching effect, and leave the soil still quaking, long after they
have taken place;—what significance can we attach to the Press in
its present position, with its daily expenditure of lung-power in order
to bawl, to deafen, to excite, to terrify? Is it anything more than an
everlasting false alarm, which tries to lead our ears and our wits into
a false direction?
%
A nation and a man whose soul has come to light through some great
event generally feel the immediate need of some act of childishness or
coarseness, as much from shame as for purposes of recreation.
%
National differences consist, far more than has hitherto been observed,
only in the differences of various grades of culture, and are only to a
very small extent permanent (nor even that in a strict sense). For this
reason all arguments based on national character are so little binding
on one who aims at the alteration of convictions—in other words, at
culture. If, for instance, we consider all that has already been German,
we shall improve upon the hypothetical question, “What is German?” by
the counter-question, “What is _now_ German?” and every good German
will answer it practically, by overcoming his German characteristics. For
when a nation advances and grows, it bursts the girdle previously given
to it by its national outlook. When it remains stationary or declines,
its soul is surrounded by a fresh girdle, and the crust, as it becomes
harder and harder, builds a prison around, with walls growing ever
higher. Hence if a nation has much that is firmly established, this is
a sign that it wishes to petrify and would like to become nothing but a
monument. This happened, from a definite date, in the case of Egypt. So he
who is well-disposed towards the Germans may for his part consider how he
may more and more grow out of what is German. The tendency to be un-German
has therefore always been a mark of efficient members of our nation.
%
A foreigner who travelled in Germany found favour or the reverse
by certain assertions of his, according to the districts in which he
stayed. All intelligent Suabians, he used to say, are coquettish.—The
other Suabians still believed that Uhland was a poet and Goethe
immoral.—The best about German novels now in vogue was that one
need not read them, for one knew already what they contained.—The
native of Berlin seemed more good-humoured than the South German, for
he was all too fond of mocking, and so could endure mockery himself,
which the South German could not.—The intellect of the Germans was
kept down by their beer and their newspapers: he recommended them tea
and pamphlets, of course as a cure.—He advised us to contemplate the
different nations of worn-out Europe and see how well each displayed
some particular quality of old age, to the delight of those who sit
before the great spectacle: how the French successfully represent the
cleverness and amiability of old age, the English the experience and
reserve, the Italians the innocence and candour. Can the other masks
of old age be wanting? Where is the proud old man, the domineering old
man, the covetous old man?—The most dangerous region in Germany was
Saxony and Thuringia: nowhere else was there more mental nimbleness, more
knowledge of men, side by side with freedom of thought; and all this was
so modestly veiled by the ugly dialect and the zealous officiousness of
the inhabitants that one hardly noticed that one here had to deal with
the intellectual drill-sergeants of Germany, her teachers for good or
evil.—The arrogance of the North Germans was kept in check by their
tendency to obey, that of the South Germans by their tendency—to make
themselves comfortable.—It appeared to him that in their women German
men possessed awkward but self-opinionated housewives, who belauded
themselves so perseveringly that they had almost persuaded the world,
and at any rate their husbands, of their peculiarly German housewifely
virtue.—When the conversation turned on Germany’s home and foreign
policy, he used to say (he called it “betray the secret”) that
Germany’s greatest statesman did not believe in great statesmen.—The
future of Germany he found menaced and menacing, for Germans had forgotten
how to enjoy themselves (an art that the Italians understood so well),
but, by the great games of chance called wars and dynastic revolutions,
had accustomed themselves to emotionalism, and consequently would one
day have an _émeute_. For that is the strongest emotion that a nation
can procure for itself.—The German Socialist was all the more dangerous
because impelled by no definite necessity: his trouble lay in not knowing
what he wanted; so, even if he attained many of his objects, he would
still pine away from desire in the midst of delights, just like Faust,
but presumably like a very vulgar Faust. “For the Faust-Devil,” he
finally exclaimed, “by whom cultured Germans were so much plagued, was
exorcised by Bismarck; but now the Devil has entered into the swine,(17)
and is worse than ever!”
%
Most men are nothing and count for nothing until they have arrayed
themselves in universal convictions and public opinions. This is in
accordance with the tailors’ philosophy, “The apparel makes the
man.” Of exceptional men, however, it must be said, “The wearer
primarily makes the apparel.” Here opinions cease to be public, and
become something else than masks, ornament, and disguise.
%
In order not to confound the sobriety arising from mental exhaustion with
that arising from moderation, one must remark that the former is peevish,
the latter cheerful.
%
To call a thing good not a day longer than it appears to us good,
and above all not a day earlier—that is the only way to keep joy
pure. Otherwise, joy all too easily becomes insipid and rotten to the
taste, and counts, for whole strata of the people, among the adulterated
foodstuffs.
%
When a man does his very best, those who mean well towards him, but are
not capable of appreciating him, speedily seek a scapegoat to immolate,
thinking it is the scapegoat of sin—but it is the scapegoat of virtue.
%
To honour and acknowledge even the bad, when it _pleases_ one, and to
have no conception of how one could be ashamed of being pleased thereat,
is the mark of sovereignty in things great and small.
%
The man of mark gradually learns that so far as he has influence he is
a phantom in other brains, and perhaps he falls into a state of subtle
vexation of soul, in which he asks himself whether he must not maintain
this phantom of himself for the benefit of his fellow-men.
%
When one takes away (or anticipates) the smallest thing that another
possesses, the latter is blind to the fact that he has been given
something greater, nay, even the greatest thing.
%
All rejection and negation betoken a deficiency in fertility. If we were
good ploughland, we should allow nothing to be unused or lost, and in
every thing, event, or person we should welcome manure, rain, or sunshine.
%
If a man renounces the world and intentionally lives in solitude, he
may come to regard intercourse with others, which he enjoys but seldom,
as a special delicacy.
%
We must advertise our misfortunes and from time to time heave audible
sighs and show visible marks of impatience. For if we could let others
see how assured and happy we are in spite of pain and privation, how
envious and ill-tempered they would become at the sight!—But we must
take care not to corrupt our fellow-men; besides, if they knew the truth,
they would levy a heavy toll upon us. At any rate our public misfortune
is our private advantage.
%
On the heights it is warmer than people in the valleys suppose, especially
in winter. The thinker recognises the full import of this simile.
%
It is not enough to practise the good one must have willed it, and, as
the poet says, include the Godhead in our will. But the beautiful we
must not will, we must be capable of it, in innocence and blindness,
without any psychical curiosity. He that lights his lantern to find
perfect men should remember the token by which to know them. They are
the men who always act for the sake of the good and in so doing always
attain to the beautiful without thinking of the beautiful. Many better
and nobler men, from impotence or from want of beauty in their souls,
remain unrefreshing and ugly to behold, with all their good will and
good works. They rebuff and injure even virtue through the repulsive
garb in which their bad taste arrays her.
%
We must beware of basing our lives on too narrow a foundation of
appetite. For if we renounce all the joys involved in positions, honours,
associations, revels, creature comforts, and arts, a day may come when
we perceive that this repudiation has led us not to wisdom but to satiety
of life.
%
Either we should hide our opinions or hide ourselves behind our
opinions. Whoever does otherwise, does not know the way of the world,
or belongs to the order of pious fire-eaters.
%
“_GAUDEAMUS IGITUR._”—Joy must contain edifying and healing forces
for the moral nature of man. Otherwise, how comes it that our soul, as
soon as it basks in the sunshine of joy, unconsciously vows to itself,
“I will be good!” “I will become perfect!” and is at once seized
by a premonition of perfection that is like a shudder of religious awe?
%
So long as you are praised, believe that you are not yet on your own
course but on that of another.
%
The apprentice and the master love the master in different ways.
%
“Nature is too beautiful for thee, poor mortal,” one often feels. But
now and then, at a profound contemplation of all that is human, in its
fulness, vigour, tenderness, and complexity, I have felt as if I must say,
in all humility, “Man also is too beautiful for the contemplation of
man!” Nor did I mean the moral man alone, but every one.
%
When life has treated us in true robber fashion, and has taken away
all that it could of honour, joys, connections, health, and property
of every kind, we perhaps discover in the end, after the first shock,
that we are richer than before. For now we know for the first time what
is so peculiarly ours that no robber hand can touch it, and perhaps,
after all the plunder and devastation, we come forward with the airs of
a mighty real estate owner.
%
The most painful feeling that exists is finding out that we are always
taken for something higher than we really are. For we must thereby
confess to ourselves, “There is in you some element of fraud—your
speech, your expression, your bearing, your eye, your dealings; and this
deceitful something is as necessary as your usual honesty, but constantly
destroys its effect and its value.”
%
We must not let ourselves be tyrannised even by that finest faculty of
idealising things: otherwise, truth will one day part company from us with
the insulting remark: “Thou arch-liar, what have I to do with thee?”
%
When one is misunderstood generally, it is impossible to remove a
particular misunderstanding. This point must be recognised, to save
superfluous expenditure of energy in self-defence.
%
Go on drinking your wine, which has refreshed you all your life—what
affair is it of yours if I have to be a water-drinker? Are not wine and
water peaceable, brotherly elements, that can live side by side without
mutual recriminations?
%
In solitude the lonely man is eaten up by himself, among crowds by the
many. Choose which you prefer.
%
“Some time the hour will come at last, the hour that will envelop
you in the golden cloud of painlessness; when the soul enjoys its own
weariness and, happy in patient playing with patience, resembles the waves
of a lake, which on a quiet summer day, in the reflection of a many-hued
evening sky, sip and sip at the shore and again are hushed—without end,
without purpose, without satiety, without need—all calm rejoicing in
change, all ebb and flow of Nature’s pulse.” Such is the feeling and
talk of all invalids, but if they attain that hour, a brief period of
enjoyment is followed by ennui. But this is the thawing-wind of the
frozen will, which awakes, stirs, and once more begets desire upon
desire.—Desire is a sign of convalescence or recovery.
%
It happens sometimes by an exception that a man only reaches the highest
when he disclaims his ideal. For this ideal previously drove him onward
too violently, so that in the middle of the track he regularly got out
of breath and had to rest.
%
It should be regarded as a sign of an envious but aspiring man, when he
feels himself attracted by the thought that with regard to the eminent
there is but one salvation—love.
%
Just as the wit of many men does not keep pace with opportunity (so that
opportunity has already passed through the door while wit still waits
on the staircase outside), so others have a kind of staircase happiness,
which walks too slowly to keep pace with swift-footed Time. The best that
it can enjoy of an experience, of a whole span of life, falls to its share
long afterwards, often only as a weak, spicy fragrance, giving rise to
longing and sadness—as if “it might have been possible”—some time
or other—to drink one’s fill of this element: but now it is too late.
%
The fact that an intellect contains a few worms does not detract from
its ripeness.
%
A good seat on horseback robs an opponent of his courage, the spectator of
his heart—why attack such a man? Sit like one who has been victorious!
%
From excessive admiration for the virtues of others one can lose the
sense of one’s own, and finally, through lack of practice, lose these
virtues themselves, without retaining the alien virtues as compensation.
%
He who is often ill not only has a far greater pleasure in health, on
account of his so often getting well, but acquires a very keen sense
of what is healthy or sickly in actions and achievements, both his own
and others’. Thus, for example, it is just the writers of uncertain
health—among whom, unfortunately, nearly all great writers must be
classed—who are wont to have a far more even and assured tone of health
in their writings, because they are better versed than are the physically
robust in the philosophy of psychical health and convalescence and in
their teachers—morning, sunshine, forest, and fountain.
%
It cannot be helped—every master has but one pupil, and _he_ becomes
disloyal to him, for he also is destined for mastery.
%
In the mountains of truth you never climb in vain. Either you already
reach a higher point to-day, or you exercise your strength in order to
be able to climb higher to-morrow.
%
Is what you see through this window of the world so beautiful that you do
not wish to look through any other window—ay, and even try to prevent
others from so doing?
%
When we dream of persons long forgotten or dead, it is a sign that we
have suffered radical changes, and that the soil on which we live has
been completely undermined. The dead rise again, and our antiquity
becomes modernity.
%
To lie still and think little is the cheapest medicine for all diseases
of the soul, and, with the aid of good-will, becomes pleasanter every
hour that it is used.
%
You rank far below others when you try to establish the exception and
they the rule.
%
You must believe in fate—science can compel you thereto. All that
develops in you out of that belief—cowardice, devotion or loftiness,
and uprightness—bears witness to the soil in which the grain was sown,
but not to the grain itself, for from that seed anything and everything
can grow.
%
He that prefers the beautiful to the useful in life will undoubtedly,
like children who prefer sweetmeats to bread, destroy his digestion and
acquire a very fretful outlook on the world.
%
We can make our own talent once more acceptable to ourselves by honouring
and enjoying the opposite talent for some time to excess.—Using excess
as a remedy is one of the more refined devices in the art of life.
%
“WILL A SELF.”—Active, successful natures act, not according to the
maxim, “Know thyself,” but as if always confronted with the command,
“Will a self, so you will become a self.”—Fate seems always to have
left them a choice. Inactive, contemplative natures, on the other hand,
reflect on how they have chosen their self “once for all” at their
entry into life.
%
How small is the importance of followers we first grasp when we have
ceased to be the followers of our followers.
%
We must understand how to obscure ourselves in order to get rid of the
gnat-swarms of pestering admirers.
%
There is an ennui of the most subtle and cultured brains, to which the
best that the world can offer has become stale. Accustomed to eat ever
more and more recherché fare and to feel disgust at coarser diet, they
are in danger of dying of hunger. For the very best exists but in small
quantities, and has sometimes become inaccessible or hard as stone,
so that even good teeth can no longer bite it.
%
The admiration of a quality or of an art may be so strong as to deter
us from aspiring to possess that quality or art.
%
One man wants to enjoy himself by means of art, another for a time to
get out of or above himself.—To meet both requirements there exists
a twofold species of artists.
%
Whoever secedes from us offends not us, perhaps, but certainly our
adherents.
%
It is only long after the death of a man that we find it inconceivable
that he should be missed—in the case of really great men, only after
decades. Those who are honest usually think when any one dies that he
is not much missed, and that the pompous funeral oration is a piece of
hypocrisy. Necessity first teaches the necessariness of an individual,
and the proper epitaph is a belated sigh.
%
We must leave many things in the Hades of half-conscious feeling, and
not try to release them from their shadow-existence, or else they will
become, as thoughts and words, our demoniacal tyrants, with cruel lust
after our blood.
%
Even the richest intellect sometimes mislays the key to the room in which
his hoarded treasures repose. He is then like the poorest of the poor,
who must beg to get a living.
%
To him who has thought a great deal, every new thought that he hears or
reads at once assumes the form of a chain.
%
In the gilded sheath of pity is sometimes hidden the dagger of envy.
%
To aspire to a lofty aim and to will the means to that aim.
%
He who has no hope of victory in a combat, or who is obviously worsted,
is all the more desirous that his style of fighting should be admired.
%
At the moment when one is beginning to take philosophy seriously, the
whole world fancies that one is doing the reverse.
%
By imitation, the bad gains, the good loses credit—especially in art.
%
“Oh that I had but lived in those times!” is the exclamation of
foolish and frivolous men. At every period of history that we seriously
review, even if it be the most belauded era of the past, we shall rather
cry out at the end, “Anything but a return to that! The spirit of
that age would oppress you with the weight of a hundred atmospheres,
the good and beautiful in it you would not enjoy, its evil you could
not digest.” Depend upon it, posterity will pass the same verdict on
our own epoch, and say that it was unbearable, that life under such
conditions was intolerable. “And yet every one can endure his own
times?” Yes, because the spirit of his age not only lies _upon_ him
but is _in_ him. The spirit of the age offers resistance to itself and
can bear itself.
%
By greatness in our comportment we embitter our foes; by envy that we do
not conceal we almost reconcile them to us. For envy levels and makes
equal; it is an unconscious, plaintive variety of modesty.—It may be
indeed that here and there, for the sake of the above-named advantage,
envy has been assumed as a mask by those who are not envious. Certainly,
however, greatness in comportment is often used as the mask of envy
by ambitious men who would rather suffer drawbacks and embitter their
foes than let it be seen that they place them on an equal footing with
themselves.
%
You gave him an opportunity of displaying the greatness of his character,
and he did not make use of the opportunity. He will never forgive you
for that.
%
The most senile thought ever conceived about men lies in the famous
saying, “The ego is always hateful,” the most childish in the still
more famous saying, “Love thy neighbour as thyself.”—With the one
knowledge of men has ceased, with the other it has not yet begun.
%
“We still belong to the mob so long as we always shift the blame on to
others; we are on the track of wisdom when we always make ourselves alone
responsible; but the wise man finds no one to blame, neither himself nor
others.”—Who said that? Epictetus, eighteen hundred years ago.—The
world has heard but forgotten the saying.—No, the world has not heard
and not forgotten it: everything is not forgotten. But we had not the
necessary ear, the ear of Epictetus.—So he whispered it into his own
ear?—Even so: wisdom is the whispering of the sage to himself in the
crowded market-place.
%
We always stand a few paces too near ourselves and a few paces too
far from our neighbour. Hence we judge him too much in the lump, and
ourselves too much by individual, occasional, insignificant features
and circumstances.
%
How little we care whether another knows a subject or not!—whereas he
perhaps sweats blood at the bare idea that he may be considered ignorant
on the point. Yes, there are exquisite fools, who always go about with
a quiverful of mighty, excommunicatory utterances, ready to shoot down
any one who shows freely that there are matters in which their judgment
is not taken into account.
%
People whose innate moderation leads them to drink but the half of
every glass, will not admit that everything in the world has its lees
and sediment.
%
The followers of a great man often put their own eyes out, so that they
may be the better able to sing his praise.
%
The good generally displeases us when it is beyond our ken.
%
There is one condition that gives birth to rules, another to which rules
give birth.
%
We sometimes earn honour or love for actions and achievements which we
have long since sloughed as the snake sloughs his skin. We are hereby
easily seduced into becoming the comic actors of our own past, and into
throwing the old skin once more about our shoulders—and that not merely
from vanity, but from good-will towards our admirers.
%
The small force that is required to launch a boat into the stream must
not be confounded with the force of the stream that carries the boat
along. Yet this mistake is made in nearly all biographies.
%
The things that we buy too dear we generally turn to bad use, because
we have no love for them but only a painful recollection.  Thus they
involve a twofold drawback.
%
The pillars of the social structure rest upon the fundamental fact that
every one cheerfully contemplates all that he is, does, and attempts,
his sickness or health, his poverty or affluence, his honour or
insignificance, and says to himself, “After all, I would not change
places with any one!”—Whoever wishes to add a stone to the social
structure should always try to implant in mankind this cheerful philosophy
of contentment and refusal to change places.
%
A noble soul is not that which is capable of the highest flights, but
that which rises little and falls little, living always in a free and
bright atmosphere and altitude.
%
The noblest effect of greatness is that it gives the contemplator a
power of vision that magnifies and embellishes.
%
We show that we have attained maturity of understanding when we no longer
go where rare flowers lurk under the thorniest hedges of knowledge,
but are satisfied with gardens, forests, meadows, and ploughlands,
remembering that life is too short for the rare and uncommon.
%
He who always lives in the warmth and fulness of the heart, and, as it
were, in the summer air of the soul, cannot form an idea of that fearful
delight which seizes more wintry natures, who for once in a way are
kissed by the rays of love and the milder breath of a sunny February day.
%
You find the burden of life too heavy? Then you must increase the burden
of your life. When the sufferer finally thirsts after and seeks the
river of Lethe, then he must become a _hero_ to be certain of finding it.
%
He who has seen another’s ideal becomes his inexorable judge, and as
it were his evil conscience.
%
The useful thing about great renunciation is that it invests us with
that youthful pride through which we can thenceforth easily demand of
ourselves small renunciations.
%
You can change a brazen duty into gold in the eyes of all by always
performing something more than you have promised.
%
“Forgive us our virtues”—so should we pray to mankind.
%
Every one who enjoys thinks that the principal thing to the tree
is the fruit, but in point of fact the principal thing to it is the
seed.—Herein lies the difference between them that create and them
that enjoy.
%
What is the use of genius if it does not invest him who contemplates and
reveres it with such freedom and loftiness of feeling that he no longer
has need of genius?—To make themselves superfluous is the glory of
all great men.
%
I too have been in the underworld, even as Odysseus, and I shall often
be there again. Not sheep alone have I sacrificed, that I might be
able to converse with a few dead souls, but not even my own blood have
I spared. There were four pairs who responded to me in my sacrifice:
Epicurus and Montaigne, Goethe and Spinoza, Plato and Rousseau, Pascal and
Schopenhauer. With them I have to come to terms. When I have long wandered
alone, I will let them prove me right or wrong; to them will I listen,
if they prove each other right or wrong. In all that I say, conclude,
or think out for myself and others, I fasten my eyes on those eight and
see their eyes fastened on mine.—May the living forgive me if I look
upon them at times as shadows, so pale and fretful, so restless and,
alas! so eager for life. Those eight, on the other hand, seem to me so
living that I feel as if even now, after their death, they could never
become weary of life. But eternal vigour of life is the important point:
what matters “eternal life,” or indeed life at all?
%
